Florida, session 2026, SB1510.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 134 135 Section 1.âSubsection (6) of section 20.255, Florida 136 Statutes, is amended to read: 137 20.255âDepartment of Environmental Protection.âThere is 138 created a Department of Environmental Protection. 139 (6)âThere is created as a part of the Department of 140 Environmental Protection an Environmental Regulation Commission. 141 The commission shall be composed of seven residents of this 142 state appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the 143 Senate. In making appointments, the Governor shall provide 144 reasonable representation from all sections of the state. 145 Membership shall be representative of agriculture, the 146 development industry, local government, the environmental 147 community, lay citizens, and members of the scientific and 148 technical community who have substantial expertise in the areas 149 of the fate and transport of water pollutants, toxicology, 150 epidemiology, geology, biology, environmental sciences, or 151 engineering. The Governor shall appoint the chair, and the vice 152 chair shall be elected from among the membership. All 153 appointments shall be for 4-year terms. The Governor may at any 154 time fill a vacancy for the unexpired term. The members of the 155 commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be paid 156 travel and per diem as provided in s. 112.061 while in the 157 performance of their official duties. Administrative, personnel, 158 and other support services necessary for the commission shall be 159 furnished by the department. The commission may employ 160 independent counsel and contract for the services of outside 161 technical consultants. 162 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsections 163 (2), (3), and (5) of section 259.035, Florida Statutes, are 164 amended to read: 165 259.035âAcquisition and Restoration Council.â 166 (1)âThere is created the Acquisition and Restoration 167 Council. 168 (a)âThe council shall be composed of 12 10 voting members, 169 6 4 of whom shall be appointed by the Governor. Of these 6 four 170 appointees, 3 must three shall be from scientific disciplines 171 related to land, water, or environmental sciences, 1 must and 172 the fourth shall have at least 5 years of experience in managing 173 lands for both active and passive types of recreation, 1 must be 174 a former elected official of a county, and 1 must be a former 175 elected official of a metropolitan municipality. As used in this 176 paragraph, the term âmetropolitanâ has the same meaning as in s. 177 380.503. They shall serve 4-year terms, except that, initially, 178 to provide for staggered terms, 2 two of the appointees shall 179 serve 2-year terms. All subsequent appointments shall be for 4 180 year terms. An appointee may not serve more than 6 years. The 181 Governor may at any time fill a vacancy for the unexpired term 182 of a member appointed under this paragraph. 183 (2)âThe 6 four members of the council appointed pursuant to 184 paragraph (1)(a) and the 2 two members of the council appointed 185 pursuant to paragraph (1)(c) shall receive reimbursement for 186 expenses and per diem for travel, to attend council meetings, as 187 allowed state officers and employees while in the performance of 188 their duties, pursuant to s. 112.061. 189 (3)âThe council shall: 190 (a)âProvide assistance to the board in reviewing the 191 recommendations and plans for state-owned conservation lands 192 required under s. 253.034 and this chapter. The council shall, 193 in reviewing such plans, consider the optimization of multiple 194 use and conservation strategies to accomplish the provisions 195 funded pursuant to former s. 259.101(3)(a), Florida Statutes 196 2014, and to s. 259.105(3)(b). 197 (b)âEffective July 1, 2026, administer the Florida 198 Communities Trust established in ss. 380.501â380.515, including 199 reviewing, approving, and overseeing project applications and 200 disbursements, and implementation measures consistent with the 201 trustâs purposes. The council shall coordinate with the 202 department for rulemaking and grant cycle administration for the 203 trust, ensuring alignment with the Florida Forever Act and the 204 stateâs conservation priorities. 205 (5)âAn affirmative vote of 6 five members of the council is 206 required in order to change a project boundary or to place a 207 proposed project on a list developed pursuant to subsection (4). 208 Any member of the council, who by family or a business 209 relationship has a connection with all or a portion of any 210 proposed project, shall declare the interest before voting on 211 its inclusion on a list. 212 Section 3.âParagraph (i) of subsection (4) of section 213 259.105, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 214 259.105âThe Florida Forever Act.â 215 (4)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that projects or 216 acquisitions funded pursuant to paragraphs (3)(a) and (b) 217 contribute to the achievement of the following goals, which 218 shall be evaluated in accordance with specific criteria and 219 numeric performance measures developed pursuant to s. 220 259.035(4): 221 (i)âMitigate the effects of natural disasters and floods in 222 developed areas, as measured by: 223 1.âThe number of acres acquired within a 100-year 224 floodplain or a coastal high hazard area; 225 2.âThe number of acres acquired or developed to serve dual 226 functions as: 227 a.âFlow ways or temporary water storage areas during 228 flooding or high water events, not including permanent 229 reservoirs; and 230 b.âGreenways or open spaces available to the public for 231 recreation; 232 3.âThe number of acres that protect existing open spaces 233 and natural buffer areas within a floodplain that also serve as 234 natural flow ways or natural temporary water storage areas; and 235 4.âThe percentage of the land acquired within the project 236 boundary that creates additional open spaces, natural buffer 237 areas, and greenways within a floodplain, while precluding 238 rebuilding in areas that repeatedly flood. 239 240 Florida Forever projects and acquisitions funded pursuant to 241 paragraph (3)(c) shall be measured by goals developed by rule by 242 the Florida Communities Trust Governing Board created in s. 243 380.504. 244 Section 4.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 245 373.469, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 246 373.469âIndian River Lagoon Protection Program.â 247 (3)âTHE INDIAN RIVER LAGOON PROTECTION PROGRAM.âThe Indian 248 River Lagoon Protection Program consists of the Banana River 249 Lagoon Basin Management Action Plan, Central Indian River Lagoon 250 Basin Management Action Plan, North Indian River Lagoon Basin 251 Management Action Plan, and Mosquito Lagoon Reasonable Assurance 252 Plan, and such plans are the components of the Indian River 253 Lagoon Protection Program which achieve phosphorous and nitrogen 254 load reductions for the Indian River Lagoon. 255 (d)âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems.â 256 1.âBeginning on January 1, 2024, unless previously 257 permitted, the installation of new onsite sewage treatment and 258 disposal systems is prohibited within the Banana River Lagoon 259 Basin Management Action Plan, Central Indian River Lagoon Basin 260 Management Action Plan, North Indian River Lagoon Basin 261 Management Action Plan, and Mosquito Lagoon Reasonable Assurance 262 Plan areas where a publicly owned or investor-owned sewerage 263 system is available as defined in s. 381.0065(2)(a). Where 264 central sewerage is not available, only enhanced nutrient 265 reducing onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems or other 266 wastewater treatment systems that achieve at least 65 percent 267 nitrogen reduction are authorized. 268 2.âBy July 1, 2030, any commercial property or any 269 residential property of 10 acres or less with an existing onsite 270 sewage treatment and disposal system located within the Banana 271 River Lagoon Basin Management Action Plan, Central Indian River 272 Lagoon Basin Management Action Plan, North Indian River Lagoon 273 Basin Management Action Plan, and Mosquito Lagoon Reasonable 274 Assurance Plan areas must connect to central sewer if available 275 or upgrade to an enhanced nutrient-reducing onsite sewage 276 treatment and disposal system or other wastewater treatment 277 system that achieves at least 65 percent nitrogen reduction. For 278 all applications submitted before July 1, 2030, to a permitting 279 agency to repair, modify, or replace a conventional onsite 280 sewage treatment and disposal system on a commercial property or 281 a residential property of 10 acres or less, the permitting 282 agency shall notify the property owner of the requirement 283 provided in this subparagraph. 284 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 285 373.807, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 286 373.807âProtection of water quality in Outstanding Florida 287 Springs.âBy July 1, 2016, the department shall initiate 288 assessment, pursuant to s. 403.067(3), of Outstanding Florida 289 Springs or spring systems for which an impairment determination 290 has not been made under the numeric nutrient standards in effect 291 for spring vents. Assessments must be completed by July 1, 2018. 292 (1)(a)âConcurrent with the adoption of a nutrient total 293 maximum daily load for an Outstanding Florida Spring, the 294 department, or the department in conjunction with a water 295 management district, shall initiate development of a basin 296 management action plan, as specified in s. 403.067. For an 297 Outstanding Florida Spring with a nutrient total maximum daily 298 load adopted before July 1, 2016, the department, or the 299 department in conjunction with a water management district, 300 shall initiate development of a basin management action plan by 301 July 1, 2016. During the development of a basin management 302 action plan, if the department identifies onsite sewage 303 treatment and disposal systems as contributors of at least 20 304 percent of nonpoint source nitrogen pollution or if the 305 department determines remediation is necessary to achieve the 306 total maximum daily load, the basin management action plan must 307 shall include an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 308 remediation plan pursuant to subsection (3) for those systems 309 identified as requiring remediation. For residential properties 310 greater than 10 acres located outside the boundary of an 311 established priority focus area of an Outstanding Florida 312 Spring, such remediation plans may not prohibit the construction 313 and installation of new conventional onsite sewage treatment and 314 disposal systems, unless central sewer is available, or require 315 existing conventional onsite sewage treatment and disposal 316 systems to upgrade to a nutrient-reducing onsite sewage 317 treatment and disposal system. 318 Section 6.âSection 373.811, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 319 Section 7.âParagraph (e) of subsection (5) of section 320 380.093, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 321 380.093âResilient Florida Grant Program; comprehensive 322 statewide flood vulnerability and sea level rise data set and 323 assessment; Statewide Flooding and Sea Level Rise Resilience 324 Plan; regional resilience entities.â 325 (5)âSTATEWIDE FLOODING AND SEA LEVEL RISE RESILIENCE PLAN.â 326 (e)âEach project included in the plan must have a minimum 327 50 percent cost share unless the project assists or is within a 328 community eligible for a reduced cost share. For purposes of 329 this section, the term âcommunity eligible for a reduced cost 330 shareâ means: 331 1.âA municipality that has a population of less than 10,000 332 or fewer, according to the most recent April 1 population 333 estimates posted on the Office of Economic and Demographic 334 Researchâs website, and a per capita annual income that is less 335 than the stateâs per capita annual income as shown in the most 336 recent release from the Bureau of the Census of the United 337 States Department of Commerce that includes both measurements; 338 2.âA county that has a population of less than 50,000 or 339 fewer, according to the most recent April 1 population estimates 340 posted on the Office of Economic and Demographic Researchâs 341 website, and a per capita annual income that is less than the 342 stateâs per capita annual income as shown in the most recent 343 release from the Bureau of the Census of the United States 344 Department of Commerce that includes both measurements; or 345 3.âA municipality or county that has a per capita annual 346 income that is equal to or less than 75 percent of the stateâs 347 per capita annual income as shown in the most recent release 348 from the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of 349 Commerce; or 350 4.âA municipality or county that is a rural community as 351 defined in s. 288.0656(2). 352 Section 8.âSubsection (3) of section 380.502, Florida 353 Statutes, is amended to read: 354 380.502âLegislative findings and intent.â 355 (3)âThe Legislature further finds that the goals of land 356 conservation and community development are best served through 357 coordinated decisionmaking and streamlined oversight. It is 358 therefore the intent of the Legislature to transfer the 359 administration and oversight of the Florida Communities Trust 360 from the Department of Environmental Protection to the 361 Acquisition and Restoration Council to improve consistency and 362 effectiveness in conservation land acquisition and resource 363 stewardship It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a 364 nonregulatory agency that will assist local governments in 365 bringing local comprehensive plans into compliance and 366 implementing the goals, objectives, and policies of the 367 conservation, recreation and open space, and coastal elements of 368 local comprehensive plans, or in conserving natural resources 369 and resolving land use conflicts by: 370 (a)âResponding promptly and creatively to opportunities to 371 correct undesirable development patterns, restore degraded 372 natural areas, enhance resource values, restore deteriorated or 373 deteriorating urban waterfronts, preserve working waterfronts, 374 reserve lands for later purchase, participate in and promote the 375 use of innovative land acquisition methods, and provide public 376 access to surface waters. 377 (b)âProviding financial and technical assistance to local 378 governments, state agencies, and nonprofit organizations to 379 carry out projects and activities and to develop programs 380 authorized by this part. 381 (c)âInvolving local governments and private interests in 382 voluntarily resolving land use conflicts and issues. 383 Section 9.âSection 380.504, Florida Statutes, is amended to 384 read: 385 380.504âFlorida Communities Trust; creation; membership; 386 expenses.â 387 (1)âThere is created within the Department of Environmental 388 Protection a nonregulatory state agency and instrumentality, 389 which shall be a public body corporate and politic, known as the 390 âFlorida Communities Trust,.â administered by the Acquisition 391 and Restoration Council The governing body of the trust shall 392 consist of: 393 (a)âThe Secretary of Environmental Protection; and 394 (b)âFour public members whom the Governor shall appoint 395 subject to Senate confirmation. 396 397 The Governor shall appoint a former elected official of a county 398 government, a former elected official of a metropolitan 399 municipal government, a representative of a nonprofit 400 organization as defined in this part, and a representative of 401 the development industry. The Secretary of Environmental 402 Protection may appoint his or her deputy secretary, the director 403 of the Division of State Lands, or the director of the Division 404 of Recreation and Parks to serve in his or her absence. The 405 Secretary of Environmental Protection shall be the chair of the 406 governing body of the trust. The Governor shall make his or her 407 appointments upon the expiration of any current terms or within 408 60 days after the effective date of the resignation of any 409 member. 410 (2)âThe purpose of the trust is to assist local governments 411 in bringing into compliance and implementing the conservation, 412 recreation and open space, and coastal elements of their 413 comprehensive plans or in conserving natural resources and 414 resolving land use conflicts by providing financial assistance 415 to local governments and nonprofit environmental organizations 416 to carry out projects and activities authorized by this part Of 417 the initial governing body members, two of the Governorâs 418 appointees shall serve for a term of 2 years and the remaining 419 one shall serve for a term of 4 years from the date of 420 appointment. Thereafter, governing body members whom the 421 Governor appoints shall serve for terms of 4 years. The Governor 422 may fill any vacancy for an unexpired term. 423 (3)âGoverning body members shall receive no compensation 424 for their services, but shall be entitled to the necessary 425 expenses, including per diem and travel expenses, incurred in 426 the discharge of their duties pursuant to this part, as provided 427 by law. 428 Section 10.âSubsections (6), (7), (9) through (12), and 429 (14) of section 380.507, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 430 380.507âPowers of the trust.âThe trust shall have all the 431 powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and 432 provisions of this part, including: 433 (6)âTo award grants and make loans to local governments and 434 nonprofit organizations for the purposes listed in subsection 435 (2) and for acquiring fee title and less than fee title, such as 436 conservation easements or other interests in land, for the 437 purposes of this part. 438 (7)âTo provide by grant or loan up to the total cost of any 439 project approved according to this part, including the local 440 share of federally supported projects. The trust may require 441 local funding participation in projects. The trust shall 442 determine the funding it will provide by considering the total 443 amount of funding available for the project, the fiscal 444 resources of other project participants, the urgency of the 445 project relative to other eligible projects, and other factors 446 which the trust shall have prescribed by rule. The trust may 447 fund up to 100 percent of any local government land acquisition 448 costs, if part of an approved project. 449 (9)âTo review project recommendations and funding 450 priorities and provide acquisition decisions To invest any funds 451 held in reserves or sinking funds, or any funds not required for 452 immediate disbursement, in such investments as may be authorized 453 for trust funds under s. 215.47, and in any other authorized 454 investments, if such investments are made on behalf of the trust 455 by the State Board of Administration. 456 (10)âTo contract for and to accept donations gifts, grants, 457 loans, or other aid from the United States Government or any 458 person or corporation, including donations gifts of real 459 property or any interest in real property. 460 (11)âTo submit project recommendations, funding priorities, 461 and acquisition decisions to the Acquisition and Restoration 462 Council, which shall have final approval authority over trust 463 expenditures and acquisitions to make rules necessary to carry 464 out the purposes of this part and to exercise any power granted 465 in this part, pursuant to chapter 120. The trust shall adopt 466 rules governing the acquisition of lands with proceeds from the 467 Florida Forever Trust Fund, consistent with the intent expressed 468 in the Florida Forever Act. Such rules for land acquisition must 469 include, but are not limited to, procedures for appraisals and 470 confidentiality consistent with ss. 125.355(1)(a) and (b) and 471 166.045(1)(a) and (b), a method of determining a maximum 472 purchase price, and procedures to assure that the land is 473 acquired in a voluntarily negotiated transaction, surveyed, 474 conveyed with marketable title, and examined for hazardous 475 materials contamination. Land acquisition procedures of a local 476 land authority created pursuant to s. 380.0663 may be used for 477 the land acquisition programs described in former s. 478 259.101(3)(c), Florida Statutes 2014, and in s. 259.105 if 479 within areas of critical state concern designated pursuant to s. 480 380.05, subject to approval of the trust. 481 (12)âTo develop, in conjunction with the council, rules, 482 policies, and guidelines for the administration of the trust 483 consistent with this part and ss. 259.035 and 259.105 to 484 contract with private consultants and nonprofit organizations 485 for professional and technical assistance and advice. 486 (14)âTo conduct promotional campaigns, including 487 advertising, for the sale of communities trust license plates 488 authorized in s. 320.08058. 489 Section 11.âSection 380.512, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 490 Section 12.âSection 380.513, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 491 Section 13.âSection 380.514, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 492 Section 14.âParagraph (n) of subsection (3), and 493 subsections (4) and (9) of section 381.0065, Florida Statutes, 494 are amended, and subsection (7) of that section is reenacted, to 495 read: 496 381.0065âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems; 497 regulation.â 498 (3)âDUTIES AND POWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL 499 PROTECTION.âThe department shall: 500 (n)âRegulate and permit maintenance entities for 501 performance-based treatment systems and aerobic treatment unit 502 systems. To ensure systems are maintained and operated according 503 to manufacturerâs specifications and designs, the department 504 shall establish by rule minimum qualifying criteria for 505 maintenance entities. The criteria shall include training, 506 access to approved spare parts and components, access to 507 manufacturerâs maintenance and operation manuals, and service 508 response time. The maintenance entity shall employ a contractor 509 licensed under s. 489.105(3)(m), or part III of chapter 489, or 510 a state-licensed wastewater plant operator, who is responsible 511 for maintenance and repair of all systems under contract. The 512 department may annually review and audit up to 25 percent of all 513 inspection and maintenance reports submitted by such maintenance 514 entities for performance-based treatment systems and aerobic 515 treatment unit systems. The department may adopt rules to 516 establish procedures for such audits. 517 (4)âPERMITS; INSTALLATION; CONDITIONS.âA person may not 518 construct, repair, modify, abandon, or operate an onsite sewage 519 treatment and disposal system without first obtaining a permit 520 approved by the department. The department may issue permits to 521 carry out this section, except that the issuance of a permit for 522 work seaward of the coastal construction control line 523 established under s. 161.053 shall be contingent upon receipt of 524 any required coastal construction control line permit from the 525 department. A construction permit is valid for 18 months after 526 the date of issuance and may be extended by the department for 527 one 90-day period under rules adopted by the department. A 528 repair permit is valid for 90 days after the date of issuance. 529 When a person jointly applies for a construction permit and an 530 operating permit for the same onsite sewage treatment and 531 disposal system, the department shall concurrently process the 532 operating permit with the construction permit. An operating 533 permit must be obtained before the use of any aerobic treatment 534 unit or engineer-designed performance-based system, or if the 535 establishment generates commercial waste. Buildings or 536 establishments that use an aerobic treatment unit or generate 537 commercial waste shall be inspected by the department at least 538 annually to ensure assure compliance with the terms of the 539 operating permit. The operating permit for a residential or 540 other non-commercial onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 541 or aerobic treatment unit is valid for the lifetime of the 542 installation; however, any subsequent change in occupancy of the 543 property or any modification of the wastewater system requires 544 an operating permit modification upon such change. When an 545 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system that requires an 546 operating permit is sold or transferred, the subsequent owner 547 with a controlling interest shall provide written notice and 548 proof of ownership to the department to amend the operating 549 permit information within 60 days of such property sale or 550 transfer commercial wastewater system is valid for 1 year after 551 the date of issuance and must be renewed annually. The operating 552 permit for an aerobic treatment unit is valid for 2 years after 553 the date of issuance and must be renewed every 2 years. If all 554 information pertaining to the siting, location, and installation 555 conditions or repair of an onsite sewage treatment and disposal 556 system remains the same, a construction or repair permit for the 557 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system may be transferred 558 to another person, if the transferee files, within 60 days after 559 the transfer of ownership, an amended application providing all 560 corrected information and proof of ownership of the property. A 561 fee is not associated with the processing of this supplemental 562 information if only ownership information is updated to reflect 563 a permit transfer for a construction, repair, or an operating 564 permit. A person may not contract to construct, modify, alter, 565 repair, service, abandon, or maintain any portion of an onsite 566 sewage treatment and disposal system without being registered 567 under part III of chapter 489. A property owner who personally 568 performs construction, maintenance, or repairs to a system 569 serving his or her own owner-occupied single-family residence is 570 exempt from registration requirements for performing such 571 construction, maintenance, or repairs on that residence, but is 572 subject to all permitting requirements. A municipality or 573 political subdivision of the state may not issue a building or 574 plumbing permit for any building that requires the use of an 575 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system unless the owner or 576 builder has received a construction permit for such system from 577 the department. A building or structure may not be occupied and 578 a municipality, political subdivision, or any state or federal 579 agency may not authorize occupancy until the department approves 580 the final installation of the onsite sewage treatment and 581 disposal system. A municipality or political subdivision of the 582 state may not approve any change in occupancy or tenancy of a 583 building that uses an onsite sewage treatment and disposal 584 system until the department has reviewed the use of the system 585 with the proposed change, approved the change, and amended the 586 operating permit. 587 (a)âSubdivisions and lots in which each lot has a minimum 588 area of at least one-half acre and either a minimum dimension of 589 100 feet or a mean of at least 100 feet of the side bordering 590 the street and the distance formed by a line parallel to the 591 side bordering the street drawn between the two most distant 592 points of the remainder of the lot may be developed with a water 593 system regulated under s. 381.0062 and onsite sewage treatment 594 and disposal systems, provided the projected daily sewage flow 595 does not exceed an average of 1,500 gallons per acre per day, 596 and provided satisfactory drinking water can be obtained and all 597 distance and setback, soil condition, water table elevation, and 598 other related requirements of this section and rules adopted 599 under this section can be met. 600 (b)âSubdivisions and lots using a public water system as 601 defined in s. 403.852 may use onsite sewage treatment and 602 disposal systems, provided there are no more than four lots per 603 acre, provided the projected daily sewage flow does not exceed 604 an average of 2,500 gallons per acre per day, and provided that 605 all distance and setback, soil condition, water table elevation, 606 and other related requirements that are generally applicable to 607 the use of onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems are met. 608 (c)âNotwithstanding paragraphs (a) and (b), for 609 subdivisions platted of record on or before October 1, 1991, 610 when a developer or other appropriate entity has previously made 611 or makes provisions, including financial assurances or other 612 commitments, acceptable to the department, that a central water 613 system will be installed by a regulated public utility based on 614 a density formula, private potable wells may be used with onsite 615 sewage treatment and disposal systems until the agreed-upon 616 densities are reached. In a subdivision regulated by this 617 paragraph, the average daily sewage flow may not exceed 2,500 618 gallons per acre per day. This section does not affect the 619 validity of existing prior agreements. After October 1, 1991, 620 the exception provided under this paragraph is not available to 621 a developer or other appropriate entity. 622 (d)âParagraphs (a) and (b) do not apply to any proposed 623 residential subdivision with more than 50 lots or to any 624 proposed commercial subdivision with more than 5 lots where a 625 publicly owned or investor-owned sewage treatment system is 626 available. This paragraph does not allow development of 627 additional proposed subdivisions in order to evade the 628 requirements of this paragraph. 629 (e)âThe department shall adopt rules relating to the 630 location of onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems, 631 including establishing setback distances, to prevent groundwater 632 contamination and surface water contamination and to preserve 633 the public health. The rules must consider conventional and 634 enhanced nutrient-reducing onsite sewage treatment and disposal 635 system designs, impaired or degraded water bodies, domestic 636 wastewater and drinking water infrastructure, potable water 637 sources, nonpotable wells, stormwater infrastructure, the onsite 638 sewage treatment and disposal system remediation plans developed 639 pursuant to s. 403.067(7)(a)9.b., nutrient pollution, and the 640 recommendations of the onsite sewage treatment and disposal 641 systems technical advisory committee established pursuant to 642 former s. 381.00652. The rules must also allow a person to apply 643 for and receive a variance from a rule requirement upon 644 demonstration that the requirement would cause an undue hardship 645 and granting the variance would not cause or contribute to the 646 exceedance of a total maximum daily load. 647 (f)âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems that are 648 permitted before June 21, 2022, may not be placed closer than: 649 1.âSeventy-five feet from a private potable well. 650 2.âTwo hundred feet from a public potable well serving a 651 residential or nonresidential establishment having a total 652 sewage flow of greater than 2,000 gallons per day. 653 3.âOne hundred feet from a public potable well serving a 654 residential or nonresidential establishment having a total 655 sewage flow of less than or equal to 2,000 gallons per day. 656 4.âFifty feet from any nonpotable well. 657 5.âTen feet from any storm sewer pipe, to the maximum 658 extent possible, but in no instance shall the setback be less 659 than 5 feet. 660 6.âSeventy-five feet from the mean high-water line of a 661 tidally influenced surface water body. 662 7.âSeventy-five feet from the mean annual flood line of a 663 permanent nontidal surface water body. 664 8.âFifteen feet from the design high-water line of 665 retention areas, detention areas, or swales designed to contain 666 standing or flowing water for less than 72 hours after a 667 rainfall or the design high-water level of normally dry drainage 668 ditches or normally dry individual lot stormwater retention 669 areas. 670 (g)âThis section and rules adopted under this section 671 relating to soil condition, water table elevation, distance, and 672 other setback requirements must be equally applied to all lots, 673 with the following exceptions: 674 1.âAny residential lot that was platted and recorded on or 675 after January 1, 1972, or that is part of a residential 676 subdivision that was approved by the appropriate permitting 677 agency on or after January 1, 1972, and that was eligible for an 678 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system construction permit 679 on the date of such platting and recording or approval shall be 680 eligible for an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 681 construction permit, regardless of when the application for a 682 permit is made. If rules in effect at the time the permit 683 application is filed cannot be met, residential lots platted and 684 recorded or approved on or after January 1, 1972, shall, to the 685 maximum extent possible, comply with the rules in effect at the 686 time the permit application is filed. At a minimum, however, 687 those residential lots platted and recorded or approved on or 688 after January 1, 1972, but before January 1, 1983, shall comply 689 with those rules in effect on January 1, 1983, and those 690 residential lots platted and recorded or approved on or after 691 January 1, 1983, shall comply with those rules in effect at the 692 time of such platting and recording or approval. In determining 693 the maximum extent of compliance with current rules that is 694 possible, the department shall allow structures and 695 appurtenances thereto which were authorized at the time such 696 lots were platted and recorded or approved. 697 2.âLots platted before 1972 are subject to a 50-foot 698 minimum surface water setback and are not subject to lot size 699 requirements. The projected daily flow for onsite sewage 700 treatment and disposal systems for lots platted before 1972 may 701 not exceed: 702 a.âTwo thousand five hundred gallons per acre per day for 703 lots served by public water systems as defined in s. 403.852. 704 b.âOne thousand five hundred gallons per acre per day for 705 lots served by water systems regulated under s. 381.0062. 706 (h)1.âThe department may grant variances in hardship cases 707 which may be less restrictive than the provisions specified in 708 this section. If a variance is granted and the onsite sewage 709 treatment and disposal system construction permit has been 710 issued, the variance may be transferred with the system 711 construction permit, if the transferee files, within 60 days 712 after the transfer of ownership, an amended construction permit 713 application providing all corrected information and proof of 714 ownership of the property and if the same variance would have 715 been required for the new owner of the property as was 716 originally granted to the original applicant for the variance. A 717 fee is not associated with the processing of this supplemental 718 information. A variance may not be granted under this section 719 until the department is satisfied that: 720 a.âThe hardship was not caused intentionally by the action 721 of the applicant; 722 b.âA reasonable alternative, taking into consideration 723 factors such as cost, does not exist for the treatment of the 724 sewage; and 725 c.âThe discharge from the onsite sewage treatment and 726 disposal system will not adversely affect the health of the 727 applicant or the public or significantly degrade the groundwater 728 or surface waters. 729 730 Where soil conditions, water table elevation, and setback 731 provisions are determined by the department to be satisfactory, 732 special consideration must be given to those lots platted before 733 1972. 734 2.âThe department shall appoint and staff a variance review 735 and advisory committee, which shall meet monthly to recommend 736 agency action on variance requests. The committee shall make its 737 recommendations on variance requests at the meeting in which the 738 application is scheduled for consideration, except for an 739 extraordinary change in circumstances, the receipt of new 740 information that raises new issues, or when the applicant 741 requests an extension. The committee shall consider the criteria 742 in subparagraph 1. in its recommended agency action on variance 743 requests and shall also strive to allow property owners the full 744 use of their land where possible. 745 a.âThe committee is composed of the following: 746 (I)âThe Secretary of Environmental Protection or his or her 747 designee. 748 (II)âA representative from the county health departments. 749 (III)âA representative from the home building industry 750 recommended by the Florida Home Builders Association. 751 (IV)âA representative from the septic tank industry 752 recommended by the Florida Onsite Wastewater Association. 753 (V)âA representative from the Department of Health. 754 (VI)âA representative from the real estate industry who is 755 also a developer in this state who develops lots using onsite 756 sewage treatment and disposal systems, recommended by the 757 Florida Association of Realtors. 758 (VII)âA representative from the engineering profession 759 recommended by the Florida Engineering Society. 760 b.âMembers shall be appointed for a term of 3 years, with 761 such appointments being staggered so that the terms of no more 762 than two members expire in any one year. Members shall serve 763 without remuneration, but if requested, shall be reimbursed for 764 per diem and travel expenses as provided in s. 112.061. 765 3.âThe variance review and advisory committee is not 766 responsible for reviewing water well permitting. However, the 767 committee shall consider all requirements of law related to 768 onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems when making 769 recommendations on variance requests for onsite sewage treatment 770 and disposal system permits. 771 (i)âA construction permit may not be issued for an onsite 772 sewage treatment and disposal system in any area zoned or used 773 for industrial or manufacturing purposes, or its equivalent, 774 where a publicly owned or investor-owned sewage treatment system 775 is available, or where a likelihood exists that the system will 776 receive toxic, hazardous, or industrial waste. An existing 777 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system may be repaired if a 778 publicly owned or investor-owned sewage treatment system is not 779 available within 500 feet of the building sewer stub-out and if 780 system construction and operation standards can be met. This 781 paragraph does not require publicly owned or investor-owned 782 sewage treatment systems to accept anything other than domestic 783 wastewater. 784 1.âA building located in an area zoned or used for 785 industrial or manufacturing purposes, or its equivalent, when 786 such building is served by an onsite sewage treatment and 787 disposal system, must not be occupied until the owner or tenant 788 has obtained written approval from the department. The 789 department may not grant approval when the proposed use of the 790 system is to dispose of toxic, hazardous, or industrial 791 wastewater or toxic or hazardous chemicals. 792 2.âEach person who owns or operates a business or facility 793 in an area zoned or used for industrial or manufacturing 794 purposes, or its equivalent, or who owns or operates a business 795 that has the potential to generate toxic, hazardous, or 796 industrial wastewater or toxic or hazardous chemicals, and uses 797 an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system that is installed 798 on or after July 5, 1989, must obtain an annual system operating 799 permit from the department. A person who owns or operates a 800 business that uses an onsite sewage treatment and disposal 801 system that was installed and approved before July 5, 1989, does 802 not need to obtain a system operating permit. However, upon 803 change of ownership or tenancy, the new owner or operator must 804 notify the department of the change, and the new owner or 805 operator must obtain an annual system operating permit, 806 regardless of the date that the system was installed or 807 approved. 808 3.âThe department shall periodically review and evaluate 809 the continued use of onsite sewage treatment and disposal 810 systems in areas zoned or used for industrial or manufacturing 811 purposes, or its equivalent, and may require the collection and 812 analyses of samples from within and around such systems. If the 813 department finds that toxic or hazardous chemicals or toxic, 814 hazardous, or industrial wastewater have been or are being 815 disposed of through an onsite sewage treatment and disposal 816 system, the department shall initiate enforcement actions 817 against the owner or tenant to ensure adequate cleanup, 818 treatment, and disposal. 819 (j)âAn onsite sewage treatment and disposal system designed 820 by a professional engineer registered in the state and certified 821 by such engineer as complying with performance criteria adopted 822 by the department must be approved by the department subject to 823 the following: 824 1.âThe performance criteria applicable to engineer-designed 825 systems must be limited to those necessary to ensure that such 826 systems do not adversely affect the public health or 827 significantly degrade the groundwater or surface water. Such 828 performance criteria shall include consideration of the quality 829 of system effluent, the proposed total sewage flow per acre, 830 wastewater treatment capabilities of the natural or replaced 831 soil, water quality classification of the potential surface 832 water-receiving body, and the structural and maintenance 833 viability of the system for the treatment of domestic 834 wastewater. However, performance criteria shall address only the 835 performance of a system and not a systemâs design. 836 2.âA person electing to use an engineer-designed system 837 shall, upon completion of the system design, submit such design, 838 certified by a registered professional engineer, to the county 839 health department. The county health department may use an 840 outside consultant to review the engineer-designed system, with 841 the actual cost of such review to be borne by the applicant. 842 Within 5 working days after receiving an engineer-designed 843 system permit application, the county health department shall 844 request additional information if the application is not 845 complete. Within 15 working days after receiving a complete 846 application for an engineer-designed system, the county health 847 department shall issue the permit or, if it determines that the 848 system does not comply with the performance criteria, shall 849 notify the applicant of that determination and refer the 850 application to the department for a determination as to whether 851 the system should be approved, disapproved, or approved with 852 modification. The department engineerâs determination shall 853 prevail over the action of the county health department. The 854 applicant shall be notified in writing of the departmentâs 855 determination and of the applicantâs rights to pursue a variance 856 or seek review under the provisions of chapter 120. 857 3.âThe owner of an engineer-designed performance-based 858 system must maintain a current maintenance service agreement 859 with a maintenance entity permitted by the department. The 860 maintenance entity shall inspect each system at least twice each 861 year and shall submit an inspection report to the department 862 each time the system is inspected which states report quarterly 863 to the department on the number of systems inspected and 864 serviced. The reports may be submitted electronically, and the 865 fee for such submittals may not exceed an inflation-adjusted 866 cost that would have otherwise been required for biennial 867 operating permit renewals prior to July 1, 2026. 868 4.âThe property owner of an owner-occupied, single-family 869 residence may be approved and permitted by the department as a 870 maintenance entity for his or her own performance-based 871 treatment system upon written certification from the system 872 manufacturerâs approved representative that the property owner 873 has received training on the proper installation and service of 874 the system. The maintenance service agreement must conspicuously 875 disclose that the property owner has the right to maintain his 876 or her own system and is exempt from contractor registration 877 requirements for performing construction, maintenance, or 878 repairs on the system but is subject to all permitting 879 requirements. 880 5.âThe property owner shall obtain a biennial system 881 operating permit from the department for each system. The 882 department may shall inspect the system at least annually, or on 883 such periodic basis as the fee collected permits, and may 884 collect system-effluent samples if appropriate to determine 885 compliance with the performance criteria. The fee for the 886 biennial operating permit must shall be collected beginning with 887 the second year of system operation. 888 6.âIf an engineer-designed system fails to properly 889 function or fails to meet performance standards, the system must 890 shall be re-engineered, if necessary, to bring the system into 891 compliance with the provisions of this section. 892 (k)âAn innovative system may be approved in conjunction 893 with an engineer-designed site-specific system that is certified 894 by the engineer to meet the performance-based criteria adopted 895 by the department. 896 (l)âFor the Florida Keys, the department shall adopt a 897 special rule for the construction, installation, modification, 898 operation, repair, maintenance, and performance of onsite sewage 899 treatment and disposal systems which considers the unique soil 900 conditions and water table elevations, densities, and setback 901 requirements. On lots where a setback distance of 75 feet from 902 surface waters, saltmarsh, and buttonwood association habitat 903 areas cannot be met, an injection well, approved and permitted 904 by the department, may be used for disposal of effluent from 905 onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems. The following 906 additional requirements apply to onsite sewage treatment and 907 disposal systems in Monroe County: 908 1.âThe county, each municipality, and those special 909 districts established for the purpose of the collection, 910 transmission, treatment, or disposal of sewage shall ensure, in 911 accordance with the specific schedules adopted by the 912 Administration Commission under s. 380.0552, the completion of 913 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system upgrades to meet the 914 requirements of this paragraph. 915 2.âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems must cease 916 discharge by December 31, 2015, or must comply with department 917 rules and provide the level of treatment which, on a permitted 918 annual average basis, produces an effluent that contains no more 919 than the following concentrations: 920 a.âBiochemical Oxygen Demand (CBOD5) of 10 mg/l. 921 b.âSuspended Solids of 10 mg/l. 922 c.âTotal Nitrogen, expressed as N, of 10 mg/l or a 923 reduction in nitrogen of at least 70 percent. A system that has 924 been tested and certified to reduce nitrogen concentrations by 925 at least 70 percent shall be deemed to be in compliance with 926 this standard. 927 d.âTotal Phosphorus, expressed as P, of 1 mg/l. 928 929 In addition, onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems 930 discharging to an injection well must provide basic disinfection 931 as defined by department rule. 932 3.âIn areas not scheduled to be served by a central 933 sewerage system, onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems 934 must, by December 31, 2015, comply with department rules and 935 provide the level of treatment described in subparagraph 2. 936 4.âIn areas scheduled to be served by a central sewerage 937 system by December 31, 2015, if the property owner has paid a 938 connection fee or assessment for connection to the central 939 sewerage system, the property owner may install a holding tank 940 with a high water alarm or an onsite sewage treatment and 941 disposal system that meets the following minimum standards: 942 a.âThe existing tanks must be pumped and inspected and 943 certified as being watertight and free of defects in accordance 944 with department rule; and 945 b.âA sand-lined drainfield or injection well in accordance 946 with department rule must be installed. 947 5.âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems must be 948 monitored for total nitrogen and total phosphorus concentrations 949 as required by department rule. 950 6.âThe department shall enforce proper installation, 951 operation, and maintenance of onsite sewage treatment and 952 disposal systems pursuant to this chapter, including ensuring 953 that the appropriate level of treatment described in 954 subparagraph 2. is met. 955 7.âThe authority of a local government, including a special 956 district, to mandate connection of an onsite sewage treatment 957 and disposal system is governed by s. 4, chapter 99-395, Laws of 958 Florida. 959 8.âNotwithstanding any other law, an onsite sewage 960 treatment and disposal system installed after July 1, 2010, in 961 unincorporated Monroe County, excluding special wastewater 962 districts, that complies with the standards in subparagraph 2. 963 is not required to connect to a central sewerage system until 964 December 31, 2020. 965 (m)âA product sold in the state for use in onsite sewage 966 treatment and disposal systems may not contain any substance in 967 concentrations or amounts that would interfere with or prevent 968 the successful operation of such system, or that would cause 969 discharges from such systems to violate applicable water quality 970 standards. The department shall publish criteria for products 971 known or expected to meet the conditions of this paragraph. If a 972 product does not meet such criteria, such product may be sold if 973 the manufacturer satisfactorily demonstrates to the department 974 that the conditions of this paragraph are met. 975 (n)âEvaluations for determining the seasonal high-water 976 table elevations or the suitability of soils for the use of a 977 new onsite sewage treatment and disposal system shall be 978 performed by department personnel, professional engineers 979 registered in the state, or such other persons with expertise, 980 as defined by rule, in making such evaluations. Evaluations for 981 determining mean annual flood lines shall be performed by those 982 persons identified in paragraph (2)(l). The department shall 983 accept evaluations submitted by professional engineers and such 984 other persons as meet the expertise established by this section 985 or by rule unless the department has a reasonable scientific 986 basis for questioning the accuracy or completeness of the 987 evaluation. 988 (o)âAn application for an onsite sewage treatment and 989 disposal system permit shall be completed in full, signed by the 990 owner or the ownerâs authorized representative, or by a 991 contractor licensed under chapter 489, and shall be accompanied 992 by all required exhibits and fees. Specific documentation of 993 property ownership is not required as a prerequisite to the 994 review of an application or the issuance of a permit. The 995 issuance of a permit does not constitute determination by the 996 department of property ownership. 997 (p)âThe department may not require any form of subdivision 998 analysis of property by an owner, developer, or subdivider 999 before submission of an application for an onsite sewage 1000 treatment and disposal system. 1001 (q)âThis section does not limit the power of a municipality 1002 or county to enforce other laws for the protection of the public 1003 health and safety. 1004 (r)âIn the siting of onsite sewage treatment and disposal 1005 systems, including drainfields, shoulders, and slopes, guttering 1006 may not be required on single-family residential dwelling units 1007 for systems located greater than 5 feet from the roof drip line 1008 of the house. If guttering is used on residential dwelling 1009 units, the downspouts shall be directed away from the 1010 drainfield. 1011 (s)âNotwithstanding subparagraph (g)1., onsite sewage 1012 treatment and disposal systems located in floodways of the 1013 Suwannee and Aucilla Rivers must adhere to the following 1014 requirements: 1015 1.âThe absorption surface of the drainfield may not be 1016 subject to flooding based on 10-year flood elevations. Provided, 1017 however, for lots or parcels created by the subdivision of land 1018 in accordance with applicable local government regulations 1019 before January 17, 1990, if an applicant cannot construct a 1020 drainfield system with the absorption surface of the drainfield 1021 at an elevation equal to or above 10-year flood elevation, the 1022 department shall issue a permit for an onsite sewage treatment 1023 and disposal system within the 10-year floodplain of rivers, 1024 streams, and other bodies of flowing water if all of the 1025 following criteria are met: 1026 a.âThe lot is at least one-half acre in size; 1027 b.âThe bottom of the drainfield is at least 36 inches above 1028 the 2-year flood elevation; and 1029 c.âThe applicant installs a waterless, incinerating, or 1030 organic waste composting toilet and a graywater system and 1031 drainfield in accordance with department rules; an aerobic 1032 treatment unit and drainfield in accordance with department 1033 rules; a system that is capable of reducing effluent nitrate by 1034 at least 50 percent in accordance with department rules; or a 1035 system other than a system using alternative drainfield 1036 materials in accordance with department rules. The United States 1037 Department of Agriculture Soil Conservation Service soil maps, 1038 State of Florida Water Management District data, and Federal 1039 Emergency Management Agency Flood Insurance maps are resources 1040 that shall be used to identify flood-prone areas. 1041 2.âThe use of fill or mounding to elevate a drainfield 1042 system out of the 10-year floodplain of rivers, streams, or 1043 other bodies of flowing water may not be permitted if such a 1044 system lies within a regulatory floodway of the Suwannee and 1045 Aucilla Rivers. In cases where the 10-year flood elevation does 1046 not coincide with the boundaries of the regulatory floodway, the 1047 regulatory floodway will be considered for the purposes of this 1048 subsection to extend at a minimum to the 10-year flood 1049 elevation. 1050 (t)1.âThe owner of an aerobic treatment unit system shall 1051 maintain a current maintenance service agreement with an aerobic 1052 treatment unit maintenance entity permitted by the department. 1053 The maintenance entity shall inspect each aerobic treatment unit 1054 system at least twice each year and shall submit an inspection 1055 report to the department each time the system is inspected 1056 stating report quarterly to the department on the number of 1057 aerobic treatment unit systems inspected and serviced. The 1058 reports may be submitted electronically, and the fee for such 1059 submittals may not exceed an inflation-adjusted cost that would 1060 have otherwise been required for biennial operating permit 1061 renewals prior to July 1, 2026. 1062 2.âThe property owner of an owner-occupied, single-family 1063 residence may be approved and permitted by the department as a 1064 maintenance entity for his or her own aerobic treatment unit 1065 system upon written certification from the system manufacturerâs 1066 approved representative that the property owner has received 1067 training on the proper installation and service of the system. 1068 The maintenance entity service agreement must conspicuously 1069 disclose that the property owner has the right to maintain his 1070 or her own system and is exempt from contractor registration 1071 requirements for performing construction, maintenance, or 1072 repairs on the system but is subject to all permitting 1073 requirements. 1074 3.âA septic tank contractor licensed under part III of 1075 chapter 489, if approved by the manufacturer, may not be denied 1076 access by the manufacturer to aerobic treatment unit system 1077 training or spare parts for maintenance entities. After the 1078 original warranty period, component parts for an aerobic 1079 treatment unit system may be replaced with parts that meet 1080 manufacturerâs specifications but are manufactured by others. 1081 The maintenance entity shall maintain documentation of the 1082 substitute partâs equivalency for 2 years and shall provide such 1083 documentation to the department upon request. 1084 4.âThe owner of an aerobic treatment unit system shall 1085 obtain a system operating permit from the department and allow 1086 the department to inspect during reasonable hours each aerobic 1087 treatment unit system at least annually, and such inspection may 1088 include collection and analysis of system-effluent samples for 1089 performance criteria established by rule of the department. 1090 (u)âThe department may require the submission of detailed 1091 system construction plans that are prepared by a professional 1092 engineer registered in this state. The department shall 1093 establish by rule criteria for determining when such a 1094 submission is required. 1095 (v)âAny permit issued and approved by the department for 1096 the installation, modification, or repair of an onsite sewage 1097 treatment and disposal system transfers shall transfer with the 1098 title to the property in a real estate transaction. For any such 1099 transfer of title to a property that has an onsite sewage 1100 treatment and disposal system that has not been abandoned in 1101 accordance with the section, or which is subject to a permit for 1102 the installation, modification, repair, or operation of such a 1103 system, the real estate transaction is subject to the following 1104 requirements: 1105 1.âA title may not be encumbered at the time of transfer by 1106 new permit requirements by a governmental entity for an onsite 1107 sewage treatment and disposal system which differ from the 1108 permitting requirements in effect at the time the system was 1109 permitted, modified, or repaired. 1110 2.âAn inspection of a system may not be mandated by a 1111 governmental entity at the point of sale in a real estate 1112 transaction. 1113 3.âAt or before the time of such real estate transaction, 1114 the following notifications must be provided to the persons 1115 receiving ownership of the property: 1116 a.âA disclosure statement clearly identifying that the 1117 property is subject to regulations for an onsite sewage 1118 treatment and disposal system; 1119 b.âInformation indicating the nature and location of any 1120 existing onsite sewage treatment and disposal system components; 1121 c.âIf applicable, a statement that the property is subject 1122 to an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system operating 1123 permit and that one or more of the persons receiving a 1124 controlling interest in the property are required pursuant to 1125 this subsection to provide written notice and proof of ownership 1126 to update the operating permit information within 60 days of 1127 such real estate transaction; and 1128 d.âA copy of any valid permit for the installation, 1129 modification, repair, or operation of an onsite sewage treatment 1130 and disposal system which will transfer pursuant to this 1131 paragraph. 1132 1133 This paragraph does not affect a septic tank phase-out deferral 1134 program implemented by a consolidated government as defined in 1135 s. 9, Art. VIII of the State Constitution of 1885. 1136 (w)âA governmental entity, including a municipality, 1137 county, or statutorily created commission, may not require an 1138 engineer-designed performance-based treatment system, excluding 1139 a passive engineer-designed performance-based treatment system, 1140 before the completion of the Florida Onsite Sewage Nitrogen 1141 Reduction Strategies Project. This paragraph does not apply to a 1142 governmental entity, including a municipality, county, or 1143 statutorily created commission, which adopted a local law, 1144 ordinance, or regulation on or before January 31, 2012. 1145 Notwithstanding this paragraph, an engineer-designed 1146 performance-based treatment system may be used to meet the 1147 requirements of the variance review and advisory committee 1148 recommendations. 1149 (x)1.âAn onsite sewage treatment and disposal system is not 1150 considered abandoned if the system is disconnected from a 1151 structure that was made unusable or destroyed following a 1152 disaster and if the system was properly functioning at the time 1153 of disconnection and was not adversely affected by the disaster. 1154 The onsite sewage treatment and disposal system may be 1155 reconnected to a rebuilt structure if: 1156 a.âThe reconnection of the system is to the same type of 1157 structure which contains the same number of bedrooms or fewer, 1158 if the square footage of the structure is less than or equal to 1159 110 percent of the original square footage of the structure that 1160 existed before the disaster; 1161 b.âThe system is not a sanitary nuisance; and 1162 c.âThe system has not been altered without prior 1163 authorization. 1164 2.âAn onsite sewage treatment and disposal system that 1165 serves a property that is foreclosed upon is not considered 1166 abandoned. 1167 (y)âIf an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 1168 permittee receives, relies upon, and undertakes construction of 1169 a system based upon a validly issued construction permit under 1170 rules applicable at the time of construction but a change to a 1171 rule occurs within 5 years after the approval of the system for 1172 construction but before the final approval of the system, the 1173 rules applicable and in effect at the time of construction 1174 approval apply at the time of final approval if fundamental site 1175 conditions have not changed between the time of construction 1176 approval and final approval. 1177 (z)âAn existing-system inspection or evaluation and 1178 assessment, or a modification, replacement, or upgrade of an 1179 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system is not required for 1180 a remodeling addition or modification to a single-family home if 1181 a bedroom is not added. However, a remodeling addition or 1182 modification to a single-family home may not cover any part of 1183 the existing system or encroach upon a required setback or the 1184 unobstructed area. To determine if a setback or the unobstructed 1185 area is impacted, the local health department shall review and 1186 verify a floor plan and site plan of the proposed remodeling 1187 addition or modification to the home submitted by a remodeler 1188 which shows the location of the system, including the distance 1189 of the remodeling addition or modification to the home from the 1190 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system. The local health 1191 department may visit the site or otherwise determine the best 1192 means of verifying the information submitted. A verification of 1193 the location of a system is not an inspection or evaluation and 1194 assessment of the system. The review and verification must be 1195 completed within 7 business days after receipt by the local 1196 health department of a floor plan and site plan. If the review 1197 and verification is not completed within such time, the 1198 remodeling addition or modification to the single-family home, 1199 for the purposes of this paragraph, is approved. 1200 (7)âUSE OF ENHANCED NUTRIENT-REDUCING ONSITE SEWAGE 1201 TREATMENT AND DISPOSAL SYSTEMS.âTo meet the requirements of a 1202 total maximum daily load, the department shall implement a fast 1203 track approval process of no longer than 6 months for the 1204 determination of the use of American National Standards 1205 Institute 245 systems approved by NSF International before July 1206 1, 2020. The department shall also establish an enhanced 1207 nutrient-reducing onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 1208 approval program that will expeditiously evaluate and approve 1209 such systems for use in this state to comply with ss. 1210 403.067(7)(a)10. and 373.469(3)(d). 1211 (9)âCONTRACT OR DELEGATION AUTHORITY.âThe department may 1212 contract with or delegate its powers and duties under this 1213 section to a county as provided in s. 403.061 or s. 403.182. 1214 Section 15.âParagraph (c) of subsection (6) and paragraph 1215 (a) of subsection (7) of section 403.067, Florida Statutes, are 1216 amended to read: 1217 403.067âEstablishment and implementation of total maximum 1218 daily loads.â 1219 (6)âCALCULATION AND ALLOCATION.â 1220 (c)âAdoption of rules. The total maximum daily load 1221 calculations and allocations established under this subsection 1222 for each water body or water body segment shall be adopted by 1223 rule by the secretary pursuant to ss. 120.536(1), 120.54, and 1224 403.805. Where additional data collection and analysis are 1225 needed to increase the scientific precision and accuracy of the 1226 total maximum daily load, the department is authorized to adopt 1227 phased total maximum daily loads that are subject to change as 1228 additional data becomes available. Where phased total maximum 1229 daily loads are proposed, the department shall, in the detailed 1230 statement of facts and circumstances justifying the rule, 1231 explain why the data are inadequate so as to justify a phased 1232 total maximum daily load. The rules adopted pursuant to this 1233 paragraph are not subject to approval by the Environmental 1234 Regulation Commission and are not subject to the provisions of 1235 s. 120.541(3). As part of the rule development process, the 1236 department shall hold at least one public workshop in the 1237 vicinity of the water body or water body segment for which the 1238 total maximum daily load is being developed. Notice of the 1239 public workshop shall be published not less than 5 days nor more 1240 than 15 days before the public workshop in a newspaper of 1241 general circulation in the county or counties containing the 1242 water bodies or water body segments for which the total maximum 1243 daily load calculation and allocation are being developed. 1244 (7)âDEVELOPMENT OF BASIN MANAGEMENT PLANS AND 1245 IMPLEMENTATION OF TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY LOADS.â 1246 (a)âBasin management action plans.â 1247 1.âIn developing and implementing the total maximum daily 1248 load for a waterbody, the department, or the department in 1249 conjunction with a water management district, may develop a 1250 basin management action plan that addresses some or all of the 1251 watersheds and basins tributary to the waterbody. Such plan must 1252 integrate the appropriate management strategies available to the 1253 state through existing water quality protection programs to 1254 achieve the total maximum daily loads and may provide for phased 1255 implementation of these management strategies to promote timely, 1256 cost-effective actions as provided for in s. 403.151. The plan 1257 must establish a schedule implementing the management 1258 strategies, establish a basis for evaluating the planâs 1259 effectiveness, and identify feasible funding strategies for 1260 implementing the planâs management strategies. The management 1261 strategies may include regional treatment systems or other 1262 public works, when appropriate, and voluntary trading of water 1263 quality credits to achieve the needed pollutant load reductions. 1264 2.âA basin management action plan must equitably allocate, 1265 pursuant to paragraph (6)(b), pollutant reductions to individual 1266 basins, as a whole to all basins, or to each identified point 1267 source or category of nonpoint sources, as appropriate. For 1268 nonpoint sources for which best management practices have been 1269 adopted, the initial requirement specified by the plan must be 1270 those practices developed pursuant to paragraph (c). When 1271 appropriate, the plan may take into account the benefits of 1272 pollutant load reduction achieved by point or nonpoint sources 1273 that have implemented management strategies to reduce pollutant 1274 loads, including best management practices, before the 1275 development of the basin management action plan. The plan must 1276 also identify the mechanisms that will address potential future 1277 increases in pollutant loading. 1278 3.âThe basin management action planning process is intended 1279 to involve the broadest possible range of interested parties, 1280 with the objective of encouraging the greatest amount of 1281 cooperation and consensus possible. In developing a basin 1282 management action plan, the department shall assure that key 1283 stakeholders, including, but not limited to, applicable local 1284 governments, water management districts, the Department of 1285 Agriculture and Consumer Services, other appropriate state 1286 agencies, local soil and water conservation districts, 1287 environmental groups, regulated interests, and affected 1288 pollution sources, are invited to participate in the process. 1289 The department shall hold at least one public meeting in the 1290 vicinity of the watershed or basin to discuss and receive 1291 comments during the planning process and shall otherwise 1292 encourage public participation to the greatest practicable 1293 extent. Notice of the public meeting must be published in a 1294 newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the 1295 watershed or basin lies at least 5 days, but not more than 15 1296 days, before the public meeting. A basin management action plan 1297 does not supplant or otherwise alter any assessment made under 1298 subsection (3) or subsection (4) or any calculation or initial 1299 allocation. 1300 4.âEach new or revised basin management action plan must 1301 include all of the following: 1302 a.âThe appropriate management strategies available through 1303 existing water quality protection programs to achieve total 1304 maximum daily loads, which may provide for phased implementation 1305 to promote timely, cost-effective actions as provided for in s. 1306 403.151. 1307 b.âA description of best management practices adopted by 1308 rule. 1309 c.âFor the applicable 5-year implementation milestone, a 1310 list of projects that will achieve the pollutant load reductions 1311 needed to meet the total maximum daily load or the load 1312 allocations established pursuant to subsection (6). Each project 1313 must include a planning-level cost estimate and an estimated 1314 date of completion. 1315 d.âA list of projects developed pursuant to paragraph (e), 1316 if applicable. 1317 e.âThe source and amount of financial assistance to be made 1318 available by the department, a water management district, or 1319 other entity for each listed project, if applicable. 1320 f.âA planning-level estimate of each listed projectâs 1321 expected load reduction, if applicable. 1322 5.âThe department shall adopt all or any part of a basin 1323 management action plan and any amendment to such plan by 1324 secretarial order pursuant to chapter 120 to implement this 1325 section. A basin management action plan and any amendment to 1326 such plan become effective 60 days after the date the 1327 secretarial order is filed. 1328 6.âThe basin management action plan must include 5-year 1329 milestones for implementation and water quality improvement, and 1330 an associated water quality monitoring component sufficient to 1331 evaluate whether reasonable progress in pollutant load 1332 reductions is being achieved over time. An assessment of 1333 progress toward these milestones shall be conducted every 5 1334 years, and revisions to the plan shall be made as appropriate. 1335 Any entity with a specific pollutant load reduction requirement 1336 established in a basin management action plan shall identify the 1337 projects or strategies that such entity will undertake to meet 1338 current 5-year pollution reduction milestones, beginning with 1339 the first 5-year milestone for new basin management action 1340 plans, and submit such projects to the department for inclusion 1341 in the appropriate basin management action plan. Each project 1342 identified must include an estimated amount of nutrient 1343 reduction that is reasonably expected to be achieved based on 1344 the best scientific information available. Revisions to the 1345 basin management action plan shall be made by the department in 1346 cooperation with basin stakeholders. Revisions to the management 1347 strategies required for nonpoint sources must follow the 1348 procedures in subparagraph (c)4. Revised basin management action 1349 plans must be adopted pursuant to subparagraph 5. 1350 7.âIn accordance with procedures adopted by rule under 1351 paragraph (9)(c), basin management action plans, and other 1352 pollution control programs under local, state, or federal 1353 authority as provided in subsection (4), may allow point or 1354 nonpoint sources that will achieve greater pollutant reductions 1355 than required by an adopted total maximum daily load or 1356 wasteload allocation to generate, register, and trade water 1357 quality credits for the excess reductions to enable other 1358 sources to achieve their allocation; however, the generation of 1359 water quality credits does not remove the obligation of a source 1360 or activity to meet applicable technology requirements or 1361 adopted best management practices. Such plans must allow trading 1362 between NPDES permittees, and trading that may or may not 1363 involve NPDES permittees, where the generation or use of the 1364 credits involve an entity or activity not subject to department 1365 water discharge permits whose owner voluntarily elects to obtain 1366 department authorization for the generation and sale of credits. 1367 8.âThe departmentâs rule relating to the equitable 1368 abatement of pollutants into surface waters do not apply to 1369 water bodies or waterbody segments for which a basin management 1370 plan that takes into account future new or expanded activities 1371 or discharges has been adopted under this section. 1372 9.âIn order to promote resilient wastewater utilities, if 1373 the department identifies domestic wastewater treatment 1374 facilities or onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems as 1375 contributors of at least 20 percent of point source or nonpoint 1376 source nutrient pollution or if the department determines 1377 remediation is necessary to achieve the total maximum daily 1378 load, a basin management action plan for a nutrient total 1379 maximum daily load must include the following: 1380 a.âA domestic wastewater treatment plan developed by each 1381 local government, in cooperation with the department, the water 1382 management district, and the public and private domestic 1383 wastewater treatment facilities providing services or located 1384 within the jurisdiction of the local government, which addresses 1385 domestic wastewater. Private domestic wastewater facilities and 1386 special districts providing domestic wastewater services must 1387 provide the required wastewater facility information to the 1388 applicable local governments. The domestic wastewater treatment 1389 plan must: 1390 (I)âProvide for construction, expansion, or upgrades 1391 necessary to achieve the total maximum daily load requirements 1392 applicable to the domestic wastewater treatment facility. 1393 (II)âInclude the permitted capacity in average annual 1394 gallons per day for the domestic wastewater treatment facility; 1395 the average nutrient concentration and the estimated average 1396 nutrient load of the domestic wastewater; a projected timeline 1397 of the dates by which the construction of any facility 1398 improvements will begin and be completed and the date by which 1399 operations of the improved facility will begin; the estimated 1400 cost of the improvements; and the identity of responsible 1401 parties. 1402 1403 The domestic wastewater treatment plan must be adopted as part 1404 of the basin management action plan no later than July 1, 2025. 1405 A local government that does not have a domestic wastewater 1406 treatment facility in its jurisdiction is not required to 1407 develop a domestic wastewater treatment plan unless there is a 1408 demonstrated need to establish a domestic wastewater treatment 1409 facility within its jurisdiction to improve water quality 1410 necessary to achieve a total maximum daily load. A local 1411 government is not responsible for a private domestic wastewater 1412 facilityâs compliance with a basin management action plan unless 1413 such facility is operated through a public-private partnership 1414 to which the local government is a party. 1415 b.âAn onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 1416 remediation plan developed by each local government in 1417 cooperation with the department, the Department of Health, water 1418 management districts, and public and private domestic wastewater 1419 treatment facilities. 1420 (I)âThe onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 1421 remediation plan must identify cost-effective and financially 1422 feasible projects necessary to achieve the nutrient load 1423 reductions required for onsite sewage treatment and disposal 1424 systems. To identify cost-effective and financially feasible 1425 projects for remediation of onsite sewage treatment and disposal 1426 systems, the local government shall: 1427 (A)âInclude an inventory of onsite sewage treatment and 1428 disposal systems based on the best information available; 1429 (B)âIdentify onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems 1430 that would be eliminated through connection to existing or 1431 future central domestic wastewater infrastructure in the 1432 jurisdiction or domestic wastewater service area of the local 1433 government, that would be replaced with or upgraded to enhanced 1434 nutrient-reducing onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems, 1435 or that would remain on conventional onsite sewage treatment and 1436 disposal systems; 1437 (C)âEstimate the costs of potential onsite sewage treatment 1438 and disposal system connections, upgrades, or replacements; and 1439 (D)âIdentify deadlines and interim milestones for the 1440 planning, design, and construction of projects. 1441 (II)âThe department shall adopt the onsite sewage treatment 1442 and disposal system remediation plan as part of the basin 1443 management action plan no later than July 1, 2025, or as 1444 required for Outstanding Florida Springs under s. 373.807. 1445 10.âThe following activities are prohibited within a basin 1446 management action plan adopted under this section, a reasonable 1447 assurance plan, or a pollution reduction plan: 1448 a.âThe installation of new onsite sewage treatment and 1449 disposal systems constructed within a basin management action 1450 plan area adopted under this section, a reasonable assurance 1451 plan, or a pollution reduction plan is prohibited where 1452 connection to a publicly owned or investor-owned sewerage system 1453 is available as defined in s. 381.0065(2)(a). On lots of 1 acre 1454 or less within a basin management action plan adopted under this 1455 section, a reasonable assurance plan, or a pollution reduction 1456 plan where a publicly owned or investor-owned sewerage system is 1457 not available, the installation of enhanced nutrient-reducing 1458 onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems, distributed 1459 wastewater treatment systems as defined in s. 403.814(13), or 1460 other wastewater treatment systems that achieve at least 65 1461 percent nitrogen reduction is required. 1462 b.âThe construction or installation of new domestic 1463 wastewater disposal facilities, including rapid infiltration 1464 basins, with permitted capacities of 100,000 or more gallons per 1465 day, except for those facilities that meet an advanced 1466 wastewater treatment standard of no more than 3 mg/l total 1467 nitrogen and 1 mg/l total phosphorus on an annual permitted 1468 basis, or a more stringent treatment standard if the department 1469 determines the more stringent standard is necessary to attain a 1470 total maximum daily load. 1471 c.âThe construction or installation of new facilities for 1472 the disposal of hazardous waste. 1473 11.âWhen identifying wastewater projects in a basin 1474 management action plan, the department may not require the 1475 higher cost option if it achieves the same nutrient load 1476 reduction as a lower cost option. A regulated entity may choose 1477 a different cost option if it complies with the pollutant 1478 reduction requirements of an adopted total maximum daily load 1479 and meets or exceeds the pollution reduction requirement of the 1480 original project. 1481 12.âAnnually, local governments subject to a basin 1482 management action plan or located within the basin of a 1483 waterbody not attaining nutrient or nutrient-related standards 1484 must provide to the department an update on the status of 1485 construction of sanitary sewers to serve such areas, in a manner 1486 prescribed by the department. 1487 Section 16.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) of section 1488 403.0671, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1489 403.0671âBasin management action plan wastewater reports.â 1490 (1)âBy July 1, 2021, the department, in coordination with 1491 the county health departments, wastewater treatment facilities, 1492 and other governmental entities, shall submit a report to the 1493 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 1494 House of Representatives evaluating the costs of wastewater 1495 projects identified in the basin management action plans 1496 developed pursuant to ss. 373.807 and 403.067(7) and the onsite 1497 sewage treatment and disposal system remediation plans and other 1498 restoration plans developed to meet the total maximum daily 1499 loads required under s. 403.067. The report must include all of 1500 the following: 1501 (e)âThe projected costs of installing enhanced nutrient 1502 reducing onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems on 1503 buildable lots in priority focus areas to comply with s. 1504 373.811. 1505 Section 17.âSubsection (11) of section 403.0872, Florida 1506 Statutes, is amended to read: 1507 403.0872âOperation permits for major sources of air 1508 pollution; annual operation license fee.âProvided that program 1509 approval pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s. 7661a has been received from 1510 the United States Environmental Protection Agency, beginning 1511 January 2, 1995, each major source of air pollution, including 1512 electrical power plants certified under s. 403.511, must obtain 1513 from the department an operation permit for a major source of 1514 air pollution under this section. This operation permit is the 1515 only department operation permit for a major source of air 1516 pollution required for such source; provided, at the applicantâs 1517 request, the department shall issue a separate acid rain permit 1518 for a major source of air pollution that is an affected source 1519 within the meaning of 42 U.S.C. s. 7651a(1). Operation permits 1520 for major sources of air pollution, except general permits 1521 issued pursuant to s. 403.814, must be issued in accordance with 1522 the procedures contained in this section and in accordance with 1523 chapter 120; however, to the extent that chapter 120 is 1524 inconsistent with this section, the procedures contained in this 1525 section prevail. 1526 (11)âEach major source of air pollution permitted to 1527 operate in this state must pay by June 30 between January 15 and 1528 April 1 of each year, upon written notice from the department, 1529 an annual operation license fee in an amount determined by 1530 department rule. The annual operation license fee shall be 1531 terminated immediately in the event the United States 1532 Environmental Protection Agency imposes annual fees solely to 1533 implement and administer the major source air-operation permit 1534 program in Florida under 40 C.F.R. s. 70.10(d). 1535 (a)âThe annual fee must be assessed based upon the sourceâs 1536 previous yearâs emissions and must be calculated by multiplying 1537 the applicable annual operation license fee factor times the 1538 tons of each regulated air pollutant actually emitted, as 1539 calculated in accordance with the departmentâs emissions 1540 computation and reporting rules. The annual fee shall only apply 1541 to those regulated pollutants, except carbon monoxide and 1542 greenhouse gases, for which an allowable numeric emission 1543 limiting standard is specified in the sourceâs most recent 1544 construction or operation permit; provided, however, that: 1545 1.âThe license fee factor is $25 or another amount 1546 determined by department rule which ensures that the revenue 1547 provided by each yearâs operation license fees is sufficient to 1548 cover all reasonable direct and indirect costs of the major 1549 stationary source air-operation permit program established by 1550 this section. The license fee factor may be increased beyond $25 1551 only if the secretary of the department affirmatively finds that 1552 a shortage of revenue for support of the major stationary source 1553 air-operation permit program will occur in the absence of a fee 1554 factor adjustment. The annual license fee factor may never 1555 exceed $35. 1556 2.âThe amount of each regulated air pollutant in excess of 1557 4,000 tons per year emitted by any source, or group of sources 1558 belonging to the same Major Group as described in the Standard 1559 Industrial Classification Manual, 1987, may not be included in 1560 the calculation of the fee. Any source, or group of sources, 1561 which does not emit any regulated air pollutant in excess of 1562 4,000 tons per year, is allowed a one-time credit not to exceed 1563 25 percent of the first annual licensing fee for the prorated 1564 portion of existing air-operation permit application fees 1565 remaining upon commencement of the annual licensing fees. 1566 3.âIf the department has not received the fee by March 1 of 1567 the calendar year, the permittee must be sent a written warning 1568 of the consequences for failing to pay the fee by April 1. If 1569 the fee is not postmarked by June 30 April 1 of the calendar 1570 year, the department shall impose, in addition to the fee, a 1571 penalty of 50 percent of the amount of the fee, plus interest on 1572 such amount computed in accordance with s. 220.807. The 1573 department may not impose such penalty or interest on any amount 1574 underpaid, provided that the permittee has timely remitted 1575 payment of at least 90 percent of the amount determined to be 1576 due and remits full payment within 60 days after receipt of 1577 notice of the amount underpaid. The department may waive the 1578 collection of underpayment and may not be required to refund 1579 overpayment of the fee, if the amount due is less than 1 percent 1580 of the fee, up to $50. The department may revoke any major air 1581 pollution source operation permit if it finds that the 1582 permitholder has failed to timely pay any required annual 1583 operation license fee, penalty, or interest. 1584 4.âNotwithstanding the computational provisions of this 1585 subsection, the annual operation license fee for any source 1586 subject to this section may not be less than $250, except that 1587 the annual operation license fee for sources permitted solely 1588 through general permits issued under s. 403.814 may not exceed 1589 $50 per year. 1590 5.âNotwithstanding s. 403.087(7)(a)5.a., which authorizes 1591 air pollution construction permit fees, the department may not 1592 require such fees for changes or additions to a major source of 1593 air pollution permitted pursuant to this section, unless the 1594 activity triggers permitting requirements under Title I, Part C 1595 or Part D, of the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. ss. 7470 1596 7514a. Costs to issue and administer such permits shall be 1597 considered direct and indirect costs of the major stationary 1598 source air-operation permit program under s. 403.0873. The 1599 department shall, however, require fees pursuant to s. 1600 403.087(7)(a)5.a. for the construction of a new major source of 1601 air pollution that will be subject to the permitting 1602 requirements of this section once constructed and for activities 1603 triggering permitting requirements under Title I, Part C or Part 1604 D, of the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. ss. 7470-7514a. 1605 (b)âAnnual operation license fees collected by the 1606 department must be sufficient to cover all reasonable direct and 1607 indirect costs required to develop and administer the major 1608 stationary source air-operation permit program, which shall 1609 consist of the following elements to the extent that they are 1610 reasonably related to the regulation of major stationary air 1611 pollution sources, in accordance with United States 1612 Environmental Protection Agency regulations and guidelines: 1613 1.âReviewing and acting upon any application for such a 1614 permit. 1615 2.âImplementing and enforcing the terms and conditions of 1616 any such permit, excluding court costs or other costs associated 1617 with any enforcement action. 1618 3.âEmissions and ambient monitoring. 1619 4.âPreparing generally applicable regulations or guidance. 1620 5.âModeling, analyses, and demonstrations. 1621 6.âPreparing inventories and tracking emissions. 1622 7.âImplementing the Small Business Stationary Source 1623 Technical and Environmental Compliance Assistance Program. 1624 8.âAny audits conducted under paragraph (c). 1625 (c)âAn audit of the major stationary source air-operation 1626 permit program must be conducted 2 years after the United States 1627 Environmental Protection Agency has given full approval of the 1628 program to ascertain whether the annual operation license fees 1629 collected by the department are used solely to support any 1630 reasonable direct and indirect costs as listed in paragraph (b). 1631 A program audit must be performed biennially after the first 1632 audit. 1633 Section 18.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (3) of 1634 section 403.1838, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1635 403.1838âSmall Community Sewer Construction Assistance 1636 Act.â 1637 (3)(a)âIn accordance with rules adopted by the department 1638 Environmental Regulation Commission under this section, the 1639 department may provide grants, from funds specifically 1640 appropriated for this purpose, to financially disadvantaged 1641 small communities for up to 100 percent of the costs of 1642 planning, designing, constructing, upgrading, or replacing 1643 wastewater collection, transmission, treatment, disposal, and 1644 reuse facilities, including necessary legal and administrative 1645 expenses. 1646 (b)âThe rules of the department Environmental Regulation 1647 Commission must: 1648 1.âRequire that projects to plan, design, construct, 1649 upgrade, or replace wastewater collection, transmission, 1650 treatment, disposal, and reuse facilities be cost-effective, 1651 environmentally sound, permittable, and implementable. 1652 2.âRequire appropriate user charges, connection fees, and 1653 other charges sufficient to ensure the long-term operation, 1654 maintenance, and replacement of the facilities constructed under 1655 each grant. 1656 3.âRequire grant applications to be submitted on 1657 appropriate forms with appropriate supporting documentation, and 1658 require records to be maintained. 1659 4.âEstablish a system to determine eligibility of grant 1660 applications. 1661 5.âEstablish a system to determine the relative priority of 1662 grant applications. The system must consider public health 1663 protection and water pollution prevention or abatement and must 1664 prioritize projects that plan for the installation of wastewater 1665 transmission facilities to be constructed concurrently with 1666 other construction projects occurring within or along a 1667 transportation facility right-of-way. 1668 6.âEstablish requirements for competitive procurement of 1669 engineering and construction services, materials, and equipment. 1670 7.âProvide for termination of grants when program 1671 requirements are not met. 1672 Section 19.âSection 403.804, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 1673 Section 20.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) and paragraph 1674 (a) of subsection (3) of section 403.9301, Florida Statutes, are 1675 amended to read: 1676 403.9301âWastewater services projections.â 1677 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 1678 (d)ââWastewater servicesâ means service to a sewerage 1679 system, as defined in s. 403.031, or service to domestic 1680 wastewater treatment works, including services to manage 1681 domestic septage from residences and establishments served by 1682 onsite treatment and disposal systems. 1683 (3)âBy June 30, 2022, and every 5 years thereafter, each 1684 county, municipality, or special district providing wastewater 1685 services shall develop a needs analysis for its jurisdiction 1686 over the subsequent 20 years. In projecting such needs, each 1687 local government shall include the following: 1688 (a)âA detailed description of the facilities used to 1689 provide wastewater services, including analysis of domestic 1690 biosolids and septage generation, treatment, management, use, 1691 and disposal in the corresponding service area. 1692 Section 21.âSubsection (1) of section 576.041, Florida 1693 Statutes, is amended to read: 1694 576.041âInspection fees; records.â 1695 (1)âEvery licensee must shall pay to the department an 1696 inspection fee in the amount of $1 per ton for fertilizer sold 1697 in this the state, except fertilizer products containing or 1698 composed of Class AA biosolids produced by a domestic wastewater 1699 or biosolids treatment facility in this state, raw ground 1700 phosphate rock, soft phosphate, colloidal phosphate, phosphatic 1701 clays and all other untreated phosphatic materials, gypsum, 1702 hydrated lime, limestone, and dolomite when sold or used for 1703 agricultural purposes, for on which the inspection fee is shall 1704 be 30 cents per ton. The inspection fees paid for Class AA 1705 biosolids-composed fertilizers must be based on the equivalent 1706 dry tons of material sold. All fees paid to the department under 1707 this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury to be 1708 placed in the General Inspection Trust Fund to be used for the 1709 sole purpose of funding the fertilizer inspection program. 1710 Section 22.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1711 576.045, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1712 576.045âNitrogen and phosphorus; findings and intent; fees; 1713 purpose; best management practices; waiver of liability; 1714 compliance; rules; exclusions; expiration.â 1715 (2)âFEES.â 1716 (a)âIn addition to the fees imposed under ss. 576.021 and 1717 576.041, the following supplemental fees shall be collected and 1718 paid by licensees for the sole purpose of implementing this 1719 section: 1720 1.âOne hundred dollars for each license to distribute 1721 fertilizer. 1722 2.âOne hundred dollars for each specialty fertilizer 1723 registration. 1724 3.âFifty cents per ton for all fertilizer that contains 1725 nitrogen or phosphorus and that is sold in this state. 1726 4.âTwenty-five cents per ton for Class AA biosolids 1727 produced by a domestic wastewater facility, calculated based on 1728 equivalent dry tons of the Class AA biosolids-derived product. 1729 Section 23.âSubsection (6) of section 120.81, Florida 1730 Statutes, is amended to read: 1731 120.81âExceptions and special requirements; general areas.â 1732 (6)âRISK IMPACT STATEMENT.âThe Department of Environmental 1733 Protection shall prepare a risk impact statement for any rule 1734 that is proposed for adoption which approval by the 1735 Environmental Regulation Commission and that establishes or 1736 changes standards or criteria based on impacts to or effects 1737 upon human health. The Department of Agriculture and Consumer 1738 Services shall prepare a risk impact statement for any rule that 1739 is proposed for adoption that establishes standards or criteria 1740 based on impacts to or effects upon human health. 1741 (a)âThis subsection does not apply to rules adopted 1742 pursuant to federally delegated or mandated programs where such 1743 rules are identical or substantially identical to the federal 1744 regulations or laws being adopted or implemented by the 1745 Department of Environmental Protection or Department of 1746 Agriculture and Consumer Services, as applicable. However, the 1747 Department of Environmental Protection and the Department of 1748 Agriculture and Consumer Services shall identify any risk 1749 analysis information available to them from the Federal 1750 Government that has formed the basis of such a rule. 1751 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to emergency rules 1752 adopted pursuant to this chapter. 1753 (c)âThe Department of Environmental Protection and the 1754 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall prepare 1755 and publish notice of the availability of a clear and concise 1756 risk impact statement for all applicable rules. The risk impact 1757 statement must explain the risk to the public health addressed 1758 by the rule and shall identify and summarize the source of the 1759 scientific information used in evaluating that risk. 1760 (d)âNothing in this subsection shall be construed to create 1761 a new cause of action or basis for challenging a rule nor 1762 diminish any existing cause of action or basis for challenging a 1763 rule. 1764 Section 24.âSubsection (1) of section 373.421, Florida 1765 Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (b) of subsection (7) of 1766 that section is reenacted, to read: 1767 373.421âDelineation methods; formal determinations.â 1768 (1)âThe department's Environmental Regulation Commission 1769 shall adopt a unified statewide methodology for the delineation 1770 of the extent of wetlands as defined in s. 373.019(27).This 1771 methodology shall consider regional differences in the types of 1772 soils and vegetation that may serve as indicators of the extent 1773 of wetlands. This methodology shall also include provisions for 1774 determining the extent of surface waters other than wetlands for 1775 the purposes of regulation under s. 373.414. This methodology 1776 shall not become effective until ratified by the Legislature. 1777 Subsequent to legislative ratification, the wetland definition 1778 in s. 373.019(27) and the adopted wetland methodology shall be 1779 binding on the department, the water management districts, local 1780 governments, and any other governmental entities. Upon 1781 ratification of such wetland methodology, the Legislature 1782 preempts the authority of any water management district, state 1783 or regional agency, or local government to define wetlands or 1784 develop a delineation methodology to implement the definition 1785 and determines that the exclusive definition and delineation 1786 methodology for wetlands shall be that established pursuant to 1787 s. 373.019(27) and this section. Upon such legislative 1788 ratification, any existing wetlands definition or wetland 1789 delineation methodology shall be superseded by the wetland 1790 definition and delineation methodology established pursuant to 1791 this chapter. Subsequent to legislative ratification, a 1792 delineation of the extent of a surface water or wetland by the 1793 department or a water management district, pursuant to a formal 1794 determination under subsection (2), or pursuant to a permit 1795 issued under this part in which the delineation was field 1796 verified by the permitting agency and specifically approved in 1797 the permit, shall be binding on all other governmental entities 1798 for the duration of the formal determination or permit. All 1799 existing rules and methodologies of the department, the water 1800 management districts, and local governments, regarding surface 1801 water or wetland definition and delineation shall remain in full 1802 force and effect until the common methodology rule becomes 1803 effective. However, this shall not be construed to limit any 1804 power of the department, the water management districts, and 1805 local governments to amend or adopt a surface water or wetland 1806 definition or delineation methodology until the common 1807 methodology rule becomes effective. 1808 (7) 1809 (b)âWetlands contiguous to surface waters of the state as 1810 defined in s. 403.031(13), Florida Statutes (1991), shall be 1811 delineated pursuant to the departmentâs rules as such rules 1812 existed prior to January 24, 1984, while wetlands not contiguous 1813 to surface waters of the state as defined in s. 403.031(13), 1814 Florida Statutes (1991), shall be delineated pursuant to the 1815 applicable methodology ratified by s. 373.4211 for any 1816 development which obtains an individual permit from the United 1817 States Army Corps of Engineers under 33 U.S.C. s. 1344: 1818 1.âWhere a jurisdictional determination validated by the 1819 department pursuant to rule 17-301.400(8), Florida 1820 Administrative Code, as it existed in rule 17-4.022, Florida 1821 Administrative Code, on April 1, 1985, is revalidated pursuant 1822 to s. 373.414(13) and the affected lands are part of a project 1823 for which a vested rights determination has been issued pursuant 1824 to s. 380.06, or 1825 2.âWhere the lands affected were grandfathered pursuant to 1826 s. 403.913(6), Florida Statutes (1991), and proof of prior 1827 notification pursuant to s. 403.913(6), Florida Statutes (1991), 1828 is submitted to the department within 180 days of the 1829 publication of a notice by the department of the existence of 1830 this provision. Failure to timely submit the proof of prior 1831 notification to the department serves as a waiver of the 1832 benefits conferred by this subsection. 1833 3.âThis subsection shall not be applicable to lands: 1834 a.âWithin the geographical area to which an individual or 1835 general permit issued prior to June 1, 1994, under rules adopted 1836 pursuant to this part applies; or 1837 b.âWithin the geographical area to which a conceptual 1838 permit issued prior to June 1, 1994, under rules adopted 1839 pursuant to this part applies if wetland delineations were 1840 identified and approved by the conceptual permit as set forth in 1841 s. 373.414(12)(b)1. or 2.; or 1842 c.âWhere no development activity as defined in s. 380.01(1) 1843 or (2)(a)-(d) and (f) has occurred within the project boundaries 1844 since October 1, 1986; or 1845 d.âOf a project which is not in compliance with this part 1846 or the rules adopted pursuant to ss. 403.91-403.929, 1984 1847 Supplement to the Florida Statutes 1983, as amended. 1848 4.âThe wetland delineation methodology required in this 1849 subsection shall only apply within the geographical area of an 1850 individual permit issued by the United States Army Corps of 1851 Engineers under 33 U.S.C. s. 1344. The requirement to obtain 1852 such individual permit to secure the benefit of this subsection 1853 shall not apply to any activities exempt or not subject to 1854 regulation under 33 U.S.C. s. 1344. 1855 5.âNotwithstanding subsection (1), the wetland delineation 1856 methodology required in this subsection and any wetland 1857 delineation pursuant thereto, shall only apply to agency action 1858 under this part and shall not be binding on local governments 1859 except in their implementation of this part. 1860 Section 25.âParagraph (b) of subsection (23) of section 1861 403.031, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1862 403.031âDefinitions.âIn construing this chapter, or rules 1863 and regulations adopted pursuant hereto, the following words, 1864 phrases, or terms, unless the context otherwise indicates, have 1865 the following meanings: 1866 (23)ââWatersâ include, but are not limited to, rivers, 1867 lakes, streams, springs, impoundments, wetlands, and all other 1868 waters or bodies of water, including fresh, brackish, saline, 1869 tidal, surface, or underground waters. Waters owned entirely by 1870 one person other than the state are included only in regard to 1871 possible discharge on other property or water. Underground 1872 waters include, but are not limited to, all underground waters 1873 passing through pores of rock or soils or flowing through in 1874 channels, whether manmade or natural. Solely for purposes of s. 1875 403.0885, waters of the state also include navigable waters or 1876 waters of the contiguous zone as used in s. 502 of the Clean 1877 Water Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. ss. 1251 et seq., as in 1878 existence on January 1, 1993, except for those navigable waters 1879 seaward of the boundaries of the state set forth in s. 1, Art. 1880 II of the State Constitution. Solely for purposes of this 1881 chapter, waters of the state also include the area bounded by 1882 the following: 1883 (b)âThe area bounded by the line described in paragraph (a) 1884 generally includes those waters to be known as waters of the 1885 state. The landward extent of these waters shall be determined 1886 by the delineation methodology ratified in s. 373.4211. Any 1887 waters which are outside the general boundary line described in 1888 paragraph (a) but which are contiguous thereto by virtue of the 1889 presence of a wetland, watercourse, or other surface water, as 1890 determined by the delineation methodology ratified in s. 1891 373.4211, shall be a part of this waterbody. Any areas within 1892 the line described in paragraph (a) which are neither a wetland 1893 nor surface water, as determined by the delineation methodology 1894 ratified in s. 373.4211, shall be excluded therefrom. If the 1895 Florida Environmental Regulation Commission designates the 1896 waters within the boundaries an Outstanding Florida Water, 1897 waters outside the boundaries may not be included as part of 1898 such designation unless a hearing is held pursuant to notice in 1899 each appropriate county and the boundaries of such lands are 1900 specifically considered and described for such designation. 1901 Section 26.âSubsections (7) and (32) of section 403.061, 1902 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1903 403.061âDepartment; powers and duties.âThe department shall 1904 have the power and the duty to control and prohibit pollution of 1905 air and water in accordance with the law and rules adopted and 1906 promulgated by it and, for this purpose, to: 1907 (7)âAdopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to 1908 implement this act. Any rule adopted pursuant to this act must 1909 be consistent with the provisions of federal law, if any, 1910 relating to control of emissions from motor vehicles, effluent 1911 limitations, pretreatment requirements, or standards of 1912 performance. A county, municipality, or political subdivision 1913 may not adopt or enforce any local ordinance, special law, or 1914 local regulation requiring the installation of Stage II vapor 1915 recovery systems, as currently defined by department rule, 1916 unless such county, municipality, or political subdivision is or 1917 has been in the past designated by federal regulation as a 1918 moderate, serious, or severe ozone nonattainment area. Rules 1919 adopted pursuant to this act may not require dischargers of 1920 waste into waters of the state to improve natural background 1921 conditions. The department shall adopt rules to reasonably 1922 limit, reduce, and eliminate domestic wastewater collection and 1923 transmission system pipe leakages and inflow and infiltration. 1924 Discharges from steam electric generating plants existing or 1925 licensed under this chapter on July 1, 1984, may not be required 1926 to be treated to a greater extent than may be necessary to 1927 assure that the quality of nonthermal components of discharges 1928 from nonrecirculated cooling water systems is as high as the 1929 quality of the makeup waters; that the quality of nonthermal 1930 components of discharges from recirculated cooling water systems 1931 is no lower than is allowed for blowdown from such systems; or 1932 that the quality of noncooling system discharges which receive 1933 makeup water from a receiving body of water which does not meet 1934 applicable department water quality standards is as high as the 1935 quality of the receiving body of water. The department may not 1936 adopt standards more stringent than federal regulations, except 1937 as provided in s. 403.804. 1938 (32)âAdopt rules necessary to obtain approval from the 1939 United States Environmental Protection Agency to administer the 1940 Federal National Pollution Discharge Elimination System (NPDES) 1941 permitting program in Florida under ss. 318, 402, and 405 of the 1942 federal Clean Water Act, Pub. L. No. 92-500, as amended. This 1943 authority shall be implemented consistent with the provisions of 1944 part II, which shall be applicable to facilities certified 1945 thereunder. The department shall establish all rules, standards, 1946 and requirements that regulate the discharge of pollutants into 1947 waters of the United States as defined by and in a manner 1948 consistent with federal regulations; provided, however, that the 1949 department may adopt a standard that is stricter or more 1950 stringent than one set by the United States Environmental 1951 Protection Agency if approved by the Governor and Cabinet in 1952 accordance with the procedures of s. 403.804(2). 1953 1954 The department shall implement such programs in conjunction with 1955 its other powers and duties and shall place special emphasis on 1956 reducing and eliminating contamination that presents a threat to 1957 humans, animals or plants, or to the environment. 1958 Section 27.âSubsection (9) of section 403.704, Florida 1959 Statutes, is amended to read: 1960 403.704âPowers and duties of the department.âThe department 1961 shall have responsibility for the implementation and enforcement 1962 of this act. In addition to other powers and duties, the 1963 department shall: 1964 (9)âAdopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to 1965 implement and enforce this act, including requirements for the 1966 classification, construction, operation, maintenance, and 1967 closure of solid waste management facilities and requirements 1968 for, and conditions on, solid waste disposal in this state, 1969 whether such solid waste is generated within this state or 1970 outside this state as long as such requirements and conditions 1971 are not based on the out-of-state origin of the waste and are 1972 consistent with applicable law. When classifying solid waste 1973 management facilities, the department shall consider the 1974 hydrogeology of the site for the facility, the types of wastes 1975 to be handled by the facility, and methods used to control the 1976 types of waste to be handled by the facility and shall seek to 1977 minimize the adverse effects of solid waste management on the 1978 environment. Whenever the department adopts any rule stricter or 1979 more stringent than one that has been set by the United States 1980 Environmental Protection Agency, the procedures set forth in s. 1981 403.804(2) shall be followed. The department may shall not, 1982 however, adopt hazardous waste rules for solid waste for which 1983 special studies were required before prior to October 1, 1988, 1984 under s. 8002 of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 1985 U.S.C. s. 6982, as amended, until the studies are completed by 1986 the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the 1987 information is available to the department for consideration in 1988 adopting its own rule. 1989 Section 28.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) and paragraph 1990 (h) of subsection (9) of section 403.707, Florida Statutes, are 1991 amended to read: 1992 403.707âPermits.â 1993 (3) 1994 (d)âThe department may adopt rules to administer this 1995 subsection. However, the department is not required to submit 1996 such rules to the Environmental Regulation Commission for 1997 approval. Notwithstanding the limitations of s. 403.087(7)(a), 1998 permit fee caps for solid waste management facilities must shall 1999 be prorated to reflect the extended permit term authorized by 2000 this subsection. 2001 (9)âThe department shall establish a separate category for 2002 solid waste management facilities that accept only construction 2003 and demolition debris for disposal or recycling. The department 2004 shall establish a reasonable schedule for existing facilities to 2005 comply with this section to avoid undue hardship to such 2006 facilities. However, a permitted solid waste disposal unit that 2007 receives a significant amount of waste prior to the compliance 2008 deadline established in this schedule shall not be required to 2009 be retrofitted with liners or leachate control systems. 2010 (h)âThe department shall ensure that the requirements of 2011 this section are applied and interpreted consistently throughout 2012 this the state. In accordance with s. 20.255, The Division of 2013 Waste Management shall direct the district offices and bureaus 2014 on matters relating to the interpretation and applicability of 2015 this section. 2016 Section 29.âSubsection (3) of section 403.7222, Florida 2017 Statutes, is amended to read: 2018 403.7222âProhibition of hazardous waste landfills.â 2019 (3)âThis section does not prohibit the department from 2020 banning the disposal of hazardous waste in other types of waste 2021 management units in a manner consistent with federal 2022 requirements, except as provided under s. 403.804(2). 2023 Section 30.âSubsection (4) of section 403.7234, Florida 2024 Statutes, is amended to read: 2025 403.7234âSmall quantity generator notification and 2026 verification program.â 2027 (4)âWithin 30 days of receipt of a notification, which 2028 includes a survey form, a small quantity generator shall 2029 disclose its management practices and the types and quantities 2030 of waste to the county government. Annually, each county shall 2031 verify the management practices of at least 20 percent of its 2032 small quantity generators. The procedure for verification used 2033 by the county must shall be developed as part of the guidance 2034 established by the department under s. 403.7226. The department 2035 may also regulate the waste management practices of small 2036 quantity generators in order to ensure proper management of 2037 hazardous waste in a manner consistent with federal 2038 requirements, except as provided under s. 403.804(2). 2039 Section 31.âSection 403.803, Florida Statutes, is amended 2040 to read: 2041 403.803âDefinitions.âWhen used in this part act, the term, 2042 phrase, or word: 2043 (1)ââBranch officeâ means a geographical area, the 2044 boundaries of which may be established as a part of a district. 2045 (2)ââCanalâ is a manmade trench, the bottom of which is 2046 normally covered by water with the upper edges of its sides 2047 normally above water. 2048 (3)ââChannelâ is a trench, the bottom of which is normally 2049 covered entirely by water, with the upper edges of its sides 2050 normally below water. 2051 (4)ââCommissionâ means the Environmental Regulation 2052 Commission. 2053 (5)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Environmental 2054 Protection. 2055 (5)(6)ââDistrictâ or âenvironmental districtâ means one of 2056 the geographical areas, the boundaries of which are established 2057 pursuant to this act. 2058 (6)(7)ââDrainage ditchâ or âirrigation ditchâ is a manmade 2059 trench dug for the purpose of draining water from the land or 2060 for transporting water for use on the land and is not built for 2061 navigational purposes. 2062 (7)(8)ââEnvironmental district centerâ means the facilities 2063 and personnel which are centralized in each district for the 2064 purposes of carrying out the provisions of this act. 2065 (8)(9)ââHeadquartersâ means the physical location of the 2066 offices of the secretary and the division directors of the 2067 department. 2068 (9)(10)ââInsect control impoundment dikesâ means artificial 2069 structures, including earthen berms, constructed and used to 2070 impound waters for the purpose of insect control. 2071 (10)(11)ââManagerâ means the head of an environmental 2072 district or branch office who shall supervise all environmental 2073 functions of the department within such environmental district 2074 or branch office. 2075 (11)(12)ââSecretaryâ means the Secretary of Environmental 2076 Protection. 2077 (12)(13)ââStandardâ means any rule of the Department of 2078 Environmental Protection relating to air and water quality, 2079 noise, solid-waste management, and electric and magnetic fields 2080 associated with electrical transmission and distribution lines 2081 and substation facilities. The term âstandardâ does not include 2082 rules of the department which relate exclusively to the internal 2083 management of the department, the procedural processing of 2084 applications, the administration of rulemaking or adjudicatory 2085 proceedings, the publication of notices, the conduct of 2086 hearings, or other procedural matters. 2087 (13)(14)ââSwaleâ means a manmade trench which: 2088 (a)âHas a top width-to-depth ratio of the cross-section 2089 equal to or greater than 6:1, or side slopes equal to or greater 2090 than 3 feet horizontal to 1 foot vertical; 2091 (b)âContains contiguous areas of standing or flowing water 2092 only following a rainfall event; 2093 (c)âIs planted with or has stabilized vegetation suitable 2094 for soil stabilization, stormwater treatment, and nutrient 2095 uptake; and 2096 (d)âIs designed to take into account the soil erodibility, 2097 soil percolation, slope, slope length, and drainage area so as 2098 to prevent erosion and reduce pollutant concentration of any 2099 discharge. 2100 Section 32.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 403.805, 2101 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2102 403.805âSecretary; powers and duties; review of specified 2103 rules.â 2104 (1)âThe secretary shall have the powers and duties of heads 2105 of departments set forth in chapter 20, including the authority 2106 to adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to 2107 implement this chapter and the provisions of chapters 161, 253, 2108 258, 260, 369, 373, 376, 377, 378, and 380 253, 373, and 376 and 2109 this chapter. The secretary shall have rulemaking responsibility 2110 under chapter 120, but shall submit any proposed rule containing 2111 standards to the Environmental Regulation Commission for 2112 approval, modification, or disapproval pursuant to s. 403.804, 2113 except for total maximum daily load calculations and allocations 2114 developed pursuant to s. 403.067(6). The secretary shall have 2115 responsibility for final agency action regarding total maximum 2116 daily load calculations and allocations developed pursuant to s. 2117 403.067(6). The secretary shall employ legal counsel to 2118 represent the department in matters affecting the department. 2119 Except for appeals on permits specifically assigned by this act 2120 to the Governor and Cabinet, and unless otherwise prohibited by 2121 law, the secretary may delegate the authority assigned to the 2122 department by this act to the assistant secretary, division 2123 directors, and district and branch office managers and to the 2124 water management districts. 2125 (3)âAfter adoption of proposed rule 62-302.531(9), Florida 2126 Administrative Code, a nonseverability and effective date 2127 provision approved by the commission on December 8, 2011, in 2128 accordance with the commissionâs legislative authority under s. 2129 403.804, notice of which was published by the department on 2130 December 22, 2011, in the Florida Administrative Register, Vol. 2131 37, No. 51, page 4446, any subsequent rule or amendment altering 2132 the effect of such rule must shall be submitted to the President 2133 of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no 2134 later than 30 days before the next regular legislative session, 2135 and such amendment may not take effect until it is ratified by 2136 the Legislature. 2137 Section 33.âSection 403.8055, Florida Statutes, is amended 2138 to read: 2139 403.8055âDepartment adoption of federal standards. 2140 Notwithstanding s. 120.54 ss. 120.54 and 403.804, the secretary 2141 is empowered to adopt rules substantively identical to 2142 regulations adopted in the Federal Register by the United States 2143 Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to federal law, in 2144 accordance with the following procedures: 2145 (1)âThe secretary shall publish notice of intent to adopt a 2146 rule pursuant to this section in the Florida Administrative 2147 Register at least 21 days before prior to filing the rule with 2148 the Department of State. The secretary shall mail a copy of the 2149 notice of intent to adopt a rule to the Administrative 2150 Procedures Committee at least 21 days before prior to the date 2151 of filing with the Department of State. Before Prior to filing 2152 the rule with the Department of State, the secretary shall 2153 consider any written comments received within 21 days after the 2154 date of publication of the notice of intent to adopt a rule. The 2155 rule must shall be adopted upon filing with the Department of 2156 State. Substantive changes from the rules as noticed shall 2157 require republishing of notice as required in this section. 2158 (2)âAny rule adopted pursuant to this section becomes shall 2159 become effective upon the date designated in the rule by the 2160 secretary; however, no such a rule may not shall become 2161 effective earlier than the effective date of the substantively 2162 identical United States Environmental Protection Agency 2163 regulation. 2164 (3)âThe secretary shall stay any terms or conditions of a 2165 permit implementing department rules adopted pursuant to this 2166 section if the substantively identical provisions of a United 2167 States Environmental Protection Agency regulation have been 2168 stayed under federal judicial review. A stay issued pursuant to 2169 this subsection shall terminate upon completion of federal 2170 judicial review. 2171 (4)âAny domestic for-profit or nonprofit corporation or 2172 association formed, in whole or in part: 2173 (a)âTo promote conservation or natural beauty; 2174 (b)âTo protect the environment, personal health, or other 2175 biological values; 2176 (c)âTo preserve historical sites; 2177 (d)âTo promote consumer interests; 2178 (e)âTo represent labor, commercial, or industrial groups; 2179 or 2180 (f)âTo promote orderly development; 2181 2182 and any other substantially affected person may, within 14 days 2183 after the date of publication of the notice of intent to adopt a 2184 rule, file an objection to rulemaking with the department 2185 Environmental Regulation Commission. The objection shall specify 2186 the portions of the proposed rule to which the person objects 2187 and the reasons for the objection. The secretary shall not have 2188 the authority under this section to adopt those portions of a 2189 proposed rule specified in such objection. Objections which are 2190 frivolous shall not be considered sufficient to prohibit the 2191 secretary from adopting rules under this section. 2192 (5)âWhenever all or part of any rule proposed for adoption 2193 by the department is substantively identical to a regulation 2194 adopted in the Federal Register by the United States 2195 Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to federal law, such 2196 rule shall be written in a manner so that the rule specifically 2197 references such regulation whenever possible. 2198 Section 34.âSubsection (1) of section 403.814, Florida 2199 Statutes, is amended to read: 2200 403.814âGeneral permits; delegation.â 2201 (1)âThe secretary is authorized to adopt rules establishing 2202 and providing for a program of general permits under this 2203 chapter and chapter 253 and this chapter for projects, or 2204 categories of projects, which have, either singly or 2205 cumulatively, a minimal adverse environmental effect. Such rules 2206 must shall specify design or performance criteria that which, if 2207 applied, would result in compliance with appropriate standards 2208 adopted by the commission. Except as provided for in subsection 2209 (3), any person complying with the requirements of a general 2210 permit may use the permit 30 days after giving notice to the 2211 department without any agency action by the department. 2212 Section 35.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 2213 376.302, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2214 376.302âProhibited acts; penalties.â 2215 (1)âIt shall be a violation of this chapter and it shall be 2216 prohibited for any reason: 2217 (a)âTo discharge pollutants or hazardous substances into or 2218 upon the surface or ground waters of the state or lands, which 2219 discharge violates any departmental âstandardâ as defined in s. 2220 403.803 s. 403.803(13). 2221 Section 36.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 2222 380.5105, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2223 380.5105âThe Stan Mayfield Working Waterfronts; Florida 2224 Forever program.â 2225 (1)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it 2226 is the intent of the Legislature that the trust shall administer 2227 the working waterfronts land acquisition program as set forth in 2228 this section. 2229 (b)âFor projects that will require more than the grant 2230 amount awarded for completion, the applicant must identify in 2231 their project application funding sources that will provide the 2232 difference between the grant award and the estimated project 2233 completion cost. Such rules may be incorporated into those 2234 developed pursuant to s. 380.507(12) s. 380.507(11). 2235 Section 37.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2236 made by this act to section 381.0065, Florida Statutes, in a 2237 reference thereto, paragraph (k) of subsection (2) of section 2238 381.0066, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2239 381.0066âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems; 2240 fees.â 2241 (2)âThe minimum fees in the following fee schedule apply 2242 until changed by rule by the department within the following 2243 limits: 2244 (k)âResearch: An additional $5 fee shall be added to each 2245 new system construction permit issued to be used to fund onsite 2246 sewage treatment and disposal system research, demonstration, 2247 and training projects. Five dollars from any repair permit fee 2248 collected under this section shall be used for funding the 2249 hands-on training centers described in s. 381.0065(3)(j). 2250 2251 The funds collected pursuant to this subsection for the 2252 implementation of onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 2253 regulation and for the purposes of ss. 381.00655 and 381.0067, 2254 subsequent to any phased transfer of implementation from the 2255 Department of Health to the department within any county 2256 pursuant to s. 381.0065, must be deposited in the Florida Permit 2257 Fee Trust Fund under s. 403.0871, to be administered by the 2258 department. 2259 Section 38.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 2260 made by this act to section 403.067, Florida Statutes, in a 2261 reference thereto, section 373.4595, Florida Statutes, is 2262 reenacted to read: 2263 373.4595âNorthern Everglades and Estuaries Protection 2264 Program.â 2265 (1)âFINDINGS AND INTENT.â 2266 (a)âThe Legislature finds that the Lake Okeechobee 2267 watershed, the Caloosahatchee River watershed, and the St. Lucie 2268 River watershed are critical water resources of the state, 2269 providing many economic, natural habitat, and biodiversity 2270 functions benefiting the public interest, including 2271 agricultural, public, and environmental water supply; flood 2272 control; fishing; navigation and recreation; and habitat to 2273 endangered and threatened species and other flora and fauna. 2274 (b)âThe Legislature finds that changes in land uses, the 2275 construction of the Central and Southern Florida Project, and 2276 the loss of surface water storage have resulted in adverse 2277 changes to the hydrology and water quality of Lake Okeechobee 2278 and the Caloosahatchee and St. Lucie Rivers and their estuaries. 2279 (c)âThe Legislature finds that improvement to the 2280 hydrology, water quality, and associated aquatic habitats within 2281 the Lake Okeechobee watershed, the Caloosahatchee River 2282 watershed, and the St. Lucie River watershed, is essential to 2283 the protection of the greater Everglades ecosystem. 2284 (d)âThe Legislature also finds that it is imperative for 2285 the state, local governments, and agricultural and environmental 2286 communities to commit to restoring and protecting the surface 2287 water resources of the Lake Okeechobee watershed, the 2288 Caloosahatchee River watershed, and the St. Lucie River 2289 watershed, and that a watershed-based approach to address these 2290 issues must be developed and implemented immediately. 2291 (e)âThe Legislature finds that phosphorus loads from the 2292 Lake Okeechobee watershed have contributed to excessive 2293 phosphorus levels throughout the Lake Okeechobee watershed and 2294 downstream receiving waters and that a reduction in levels of 2295 phosphorus will benefit the ecology of these systems. The 2296 excessive levels of phosphorus have also resulted in an 2297 accumulation of phosphorus in the sediments of Lake Okeechobee. 2298 If not removed, internal phosphorus loads from the sediments are 2299 expected to delay responses of the lake to external phosphorus 2300 reductions. 2301 (f)âThe Legislature finds that the Lake Okeechobee 2302 phosphorus loads set forth in the total maximum daily loads 2303 established in accordance with s. 403.067 represent an 2304 appropriate basis for restoration of the Lake Okeechobee 2305 watershed. 2306 (g)âThe Legislature finds that, in addition to phosphorus, 2307 other pollutants are contributing to water quality problems in 2308 the Lake Okeechobee watershed, the Caloosahatchee River 2309 watershed, and the St. Lucie River watershed, and that the total 2310 maximum daily load requirements of s. 403.067 provide a means of 2311 identifying and addressing these problems. 2312 (h)âThe Legislature finds that the expeditious 2313 implementation of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed Protection 2314 Program, the Caloosahatchee River Watershed Protection Program, 2315 and the St. Lucie River Watershed Protection Program is needed 2316 to improve the quality, quantity, timing, and distribution of 2317 water in the northern Everglades ecosystem and that this 2318 section, in conjunction with s. 403.067, including the 2319 implementation of the plans developed and approved pursuant to 2320 subsections (3) and (4), and any related basin management action 2321 plan developed and implemented pursuant to s. 403.067(7)(a), 2322 provide a reasonable means of achieving the total maximum daily 2323 load requirements and achieving and maintaining compliance with 2324 state water quality standards. 2325 (i)âThe Legislature finds that the implementation of the 2326 programs contained in this section is for the benefit of the 2327 public health, safety, and welfare and is in the public 2328 interest. 2329 (j)âThe Legislature finds that sufficient research has been 2330 conducted and sufficient plans developed to immediately expand 2331 and accelerate programs to address the hydrology and water 2332 quality in the Lake Okeechobee watershed, the Caloosahatchee 2333 River watershed, and the St. Lucie River watershed. 2334 (k)âThe Legislature finds that a continuing source of 2335 funding is needed to effectively implement the programs 2336 developed and approved under this section which are needed to 2337 address the hydrology and water quality problems within the Lake 2338 Okeechobee watershed, the Caloosahatchee River watershed, and 2339 the St. Lucie River watershed. 2340 (l)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to protect and 2341 restore surface water resources and achieve and maintain 2342 compliance with water quality standards in the Lake Okeechobee 2343 watershed, the Caloosahatchee River watershed, and the St. Lucie 2344 River watershed, and downstream receiving waters, through the 2345 phased, comprehensive, and innovative protection program set 2346 forth in this section which includes long-term solutions based 2347 upon the total maximum daily loads established in accordance 2348 with s. 403.067. This program shall be watershed-based, shall 2349 provide for consideration of all water quality issues needed to 2350 meet the total maximum daily load, and shall include research 2351 and monitoring, development and implementation of best 2352 management practices, refinement of existing regulations, and 2353 structural and nonstructural projects, including public works. 2354 (m)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that this section 2355 be implemented in coordination with the Comprehensive Everglades 2356 Restoration Plan project components and other federal programs 2357 in order to maximize opportunities for the most efficient and 2358 timely expenditures of public funds. 2359 (n)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that the 2360 coordinating agencies encourage and support the development of 2361 creative public-private partnerships and programs, including 2362 opportunities for water storage and quality improvement on 2363 private lands and water quality credit trading, to facilitate or 2364 further the restoration of the surface water resources of the 2365 Lake Okeechobee watershed, the Caloosahatchee River watershed, 2366 and the St. Lucie River watershed, consistent with s. 403.067. 2367 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 2368 (a)ââBest management practiceâ means a practice or 2369 combination of practices determined by the coordinating 2370 agencies, based on research, field-testing, and expert review, 2371 to be the most effective and practicable on-location means, 2372 including economic and technological considerations, for 2373 improving water quality in agricultural and urban discharges. 2374 Best management practices for agricultural discharges shall 2375 reflect a balance between water quality improvements and 2376 agricultural productivity. 2377 (b)ââBiosolidsâ means the solid, semisolid, or liquid 2378 residue generated during the treatment of domestic wastewater in 2379 a domestic wastewater treatment facility, formerly known as 2380 âdomestic wastewater residualsâ or âresiduals,â and includes 2381 products and treated material from biosolids treatment 2382 facilities and septage management facilities regulated by the 2383 department. The term does not include the treated effluent or 2384 reclaimed water from a domestic wastewater treatment facility, 2385 solids removed from pump stations and lift stations, screenings 2386 and grit removed from the preliminary treatment components of 2387 domestic wastewater treatment facilities, or ash generated 2388 during the incineration of biosolids. 2389 (c)ââCaloosahatchee River watershedâ means the 2390 Caloosahatchee River, its tributaries, its estuary, and the area 2391 within Charlotte, Glades, Hendry, and Lee Counties from which 2392 surface water flow is directed or drains, naturally or by 2393 constructed works, to the river, its tributaries, or its 2394 estuary. 2395 (d)ââCoordinating agenciesâ means the Department of 2396 Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Department of 2397 Environmental Protection, and the South Florida Water Management 2398 District. 2399 (e)ââCorps of Engineersâ means the United States Army Corps 2400 of Engineers. 2401 (f)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Environmental 2402 Protection. 2403 (g)ââDistrictâ means the South Florida Water Management 2404 District. 2405 (h)ââLake Okeechobee Watershed Construction Projectâ means 2406 the construction project developed pursuant to this section. 2407 (i)ââLake Okeechobee Watershed Protection Planâ means the 2408 Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project and the Lake 2409 Okeechobee Watershed Research and Water Quality Monitoring 2410 Program. 2411 (j)ââLake Okeechobee watershedâ means Lake Okeechobee, its 2412 tributaries, and the area within which surface water flow is 2413 directed or drains, naturally or by constructed works, to the 2414 lake or its tributaries. 2415 (k)ââNorthern Evergladesâ means the Lake Okeechobee 2416 watershed, the Caloosahatchee River watershed, and the St. Lucie 2417 River watershed. 2418 (l)ââProject componentâ means any structural or operational 2419 change, resulting from the Restudy, to the Central and Southern 2420 Florida Project as it existed and was operated as of January 1, 2421 1999. 2422 (m)ââRestudyâ means the Comprehensive Review Study of the 2423 Central and Southern Florida Project, for which federal 2424 participation was authorized by the Federal Water Resources 2425 Development Acts of 1992 and 1996 together with related 2426 congressional resolutions and for which participation by the 2427 South Florida Water Management District is authorized by s. 2428 373.1501. The term includes all actions undertaken pursuant to 2429 the aforementioned authorizations which will result in 2430 recommendations for modifications or additions to the Central 2431 and Southern Florida Project. 2432 (n)ââRiver Watershed Protection Plansâ means the 2433 Caloosahatchee River Watershed Protection Plan and the St. Lucie 2434 River Watershed Protection Plan developed pursuant to this 2435 section. 2436 (o)ââSoil amendmentâ means any substance or mixture of 2437 substances sold or offered for sale for soil enriching or 2438 corrective purposes, intended or claimed to be effective in 2439 promoting or stimulating plant growth, increasing soil or plant 2440 productivity, improving the quality of crops, or producing any 2441 chemical or physical change in the soil, except amendments, 2442 conditioners, additives, and related products that are derived 2443 solely from inorganic sources and that contain no recognized 2444 plant nutrients. 2445 (p)ââSt. Lucie River watershedâ means the St. Lucie River, 2446 its tributaries, its estuary, and the area within Martin, 2447 Okeechobee, and St. Lucie Counties from which surface water flow 2448 is directed or drains, naturally or by constructed works, to the 2449 river, its tributaries, or its estuary. 2450 (q)ââTotal maximum daily loadâ means the sum of the 2451 individual wasteload allocations for point sources and the load 2452 allocations for nonpoint sources and natural background adopted 2453 pursuant to s. 403.067. Before determining individual wasteload 2454 allocations and load allocations, the maximum amount of a 2455 pollutant that a water body or water segment can assimilate from 2456 all sources without exceeding water quality standards must first 2457 be calculated. 2458 (3)âLAKE OKEECHOBEE WATERSHED PROTECTION PROGRAM.âThe Lake 2459 Okeechobee Watershed Protection Program shall consist of the 2460 Lake Okeechobee Watershed Protection Plan, the Lake Okeechobee 2461 Basin Management Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 403.067, the 2462 Lake Okeechobee Exotic Species Control Program, and the Lake 2463 Okeechobee Internal Phosphorus Management Program. The Lake 2464 Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 2465 403.067 shall be the component of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed 2466 Protection Program that achieves phosphorus load reductions for 2467 Lake Okeechobee. The Lake Okeechobee Watershed Protection 2468 Program shall address the reduction of phosphorus loading to the 2469 lake from both internal and external sources. Phosphorus load 2470 reductions shall be achieved through a phased program of 2471 implementation. In the development and administration of the 2472 Lake Okeechobee Watershed Protection Program, the coordinating 2473 agencies shall maximize opportunities provided by federal cost 2474 sharing programs and opportunities for partnerships with the 2475 private sector. 2476 (a)âLake Okeechobee Watershed Protection Plan.âTo protect 2477 and restore surface water resources, the district, in 2478 cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, shall complete 2479 a Lake Okeechobee Watershed Protection Plan in accordance with 2480 this section and ss. 373.451-373.459. Beginning March 1, 2020, 2481 and every 5 years thereafter, the district shall update the Lake 2482 Okeechobee Watershed Protection Plan to ensure that it is 2483 consistent with the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan 2484 adopted pursuant to s. 403.067. The Lake Okeechobee Watershed 2485 Protection Plan shall identify the geographic extent of the 2486 watershed, be coordinated with the plans developed pursuant to 2487 paragraphs (4)(a) and (c), and include the Lake Okeechobee 2488 Watershed Construction Project and the Lake Okeechobee Watershed 2489 Research and Water Quality Monitoring Program. The plan shall 2490 consider and build upon a review and analysis of the performance 2491 of projects constructed during Phase I and Phase II of the Lake 2492 Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project, pursuant to 2493 subparagraph 1.; relevant information resulting from the Lake 2494 Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan, pursuant to paragraph 2495 (b); relevant information resulting from the Lake Okeechobee 2496 Watershed Research and Water Quality Monitoring Program, 2497 pursuant to subparagraph 2.; relevant information resulting from 2498 the Lake Okeechobee Exotic Species Control Program, pursuant to 2499 paragraph (c); and relevant information resulting from the Lake 2500 Okeechobee Internal Phosphorus Management Program, pursuant to 2501 paragraph (d). 2502 1.âLake Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project.âTo 2503 improve the hydrology and water quality of Lake Okeechobee and 2504 downstream receiving waters, including the Caloosahatchee and 2505 St. Lucie Rivers and their estuaries, the district, in 2506 cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, shall design 2507 and construct the Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction 2508 Project. The project shall include: 2509 a.âPhase I.âPhase I of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed 2510 Construction Project shall consist of a series of project 2511 features consistent with the recommendations of the South 2512 Florida Ecosystem Restoration Working Groupâs Lake Okeechobee 2513 Action Plan. Priority basins for such projects include S-191, S 2514 154, and Pools D and E in the Lower Kissimmee River. To obtain 2515 phosphorus load reductions to Lake Okeechobee as soon as 2516 possible, the following actions shall be implemented: 2517 (I)âThe district shall serve as a full partner with the 2518 Corps of Engineers in the design and construction of the Grassy 2519 Island Ranch and New Palm Dairy stormwater treatment facilities 2520 as components of the Lake Okeechobee Water Retention/Phosphorus 2521 Removal Critical Project. The Corps of Engineers shall have the 2522 lead in design and construction of these facilities. Should 2523 delays be encountered in the implementation of either of these 2524 facilities, the district shall notify the department and 2525 recommend corrective actions. 2526 (II)âThe district shall obtain permits and complete 2527 construction of two of the isolated wetland restoration projects 2528 that are part of the Lake Okeechobee Water Retention/Phosphorus 2529 Removal Critical Project. The additional isolated wetland 2530 projects included in this critical project shall further reduce 2531 phosphorus loading to Lake Okeechobee. 2532 (III)âThe district shall work with the Corps of Engineers 2533 to expedite initiation of the design process for the Taylor 2534 Creek/Nubbins Slough Reservoir Assisted Stormwater Treatment 2535 Area, a project component of the Comprehensive Everglades 2536 Restoration Plan. The district shall propose to the Corps of 2537 Engineers that the district take the lead in the design and 2538 construction of the Reservoir Assisted Stormwater Treatment Area 2539 and receive credit towards the local share of the total cost of 2540 the Comprehensive Everglades Restoration Plan. 2541 b.âPhase II technical plan and construction.âThe district, 2542 in cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, shall 2543 develop a detailed technical plan for Phase II of the Lake 2544 Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project which provides the 2545 basis for the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan 2546 adopted by the department pursuant to s. 403.067. The detailed 2547 technical plan shall include measures for the improvement of the 2548 quality, quantity, timing, and distribution of water in the 2549 northern Everglades ecosystem, including the Lake Okeechobee 2550 watershed and the estuaries, and for facilitating the 2551 achievement of water quality standards. Use of cost-effective 2552 biologically based, hybrid wetland/chemical and other innovative 2553 nutrient control technologies shall be incorporated in the plan 2554 where appropriate. The detailed technical plan shall also 2555 include a Process Development and Engineering component to 2556 finalize the detail and design of Phase II projects and identify 2557 additional measures needed to increase the certainty that the 2558 overall objectives for improving water quality and quantity can 2559 be met. Based on information and recommendations from the 2560 Process Development and Engineering component, the Phase II 2561 detailed technical plan shall be periodically updated. Phase II 2562 shall include construction of additional facilities in the 2563 priority basins identified in sub-subparagraph a., as well as 2564 facilities for other basins in the Lake Okeechobee watershed. 2565 The technical plan shall: 2566 (I)âIdentify Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project 2567 facilities designed to contribute to achieving all applicable 2568 total maximum daily loads established pursuant to s. 403.067 2569 within the Lake Okeechobee watershed. 2570 (II)âIdentify the size and location of all such Lake 2571 Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project facilities. 2572 (III)âProvide a construction schedule for all such Lake 2573 Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project facilities, including 2574 the sequencing and specific timeframe for construction of each 2575 Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project facility. 2576 (IV)âProvide a schedule for the acquisition of lands or 2577 sufficient interests necessary to achieve the construction 2578 schedule. 2579 (V)âProvide a detailed schedule of costs associated with 2580 the construction schedule. 2581 (VI)âIdentify, to the maximum extent practicable, impacts 2582 on wetlands and state-listed species expected to be associated 2583 with construction of such facilities, including potential 2584 alternatives to minimize and mitigate such impacts, as 2585 appropriate. 2586 (VII)âProvide for additional measures, including voluntary 2587 water storage and quality improvements on private land, to 2588 increase water storage and reduce excess water levels in Lake 2589 Okeechobee and to reduce excess discharges to the estuaries. 2590 (VIII)âDevelop the appropriate water quantity storage goal 2591 to achieve the desired Lake Okeechobee range of lake levels and 2592 inflow volumes to the Caloosahatchee and St. Lucie estuaries 2593 while meeting the other water-related needs of the region, 2594 including water supply and flood protection. 2595 (IX)âProvide for additional source controls needed to 2596 enhance performance of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed 2597 Construction Project facilities. Such additional source controls 2598 shall be incorporated into the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management 2599 Action Plan pursuant to paragraph (b). 2600 c.âEvaluation.âWithin 5 years after the adoption of the 2601 Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan pursuant to s. 2602 403.067 and every 5 years thereafter, the department, in 2603 cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, shall conduct 2604 an evaluation of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction 2605 Project and identify any further load reductions necessary to 2606 achieve compliance with the Lake Okeechobee total maximum daily 2607 loads established pursuant to s. 403.067. The district shall 2608 identify modifications to facilities of the Lake Okeechobee 2609 Watershed Construction Project as appropriate to meet the total 2610 maximum daily loads. Modifications to the Lake Okeechobee 2611 Watershed Construction Project resulting from this evaluation 2612 shall be incorporated into the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management 2613 Action Plan and included in the applicable annual progress 2614 report submitted pursuant to subsection (6). 2615 d.âCoordination and review.âTo ensure the timely 2616 implementation of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction 2617 Project, the design of project facilities shall be coordinated 2618 with the department and other interested parties, including 2619 affected local governments, to the maximum extent practicable. 2620 Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project facilities shall 2621 be reviewed and commented upon by the department before the 2622 execution of a construction contract by the district for that 2623 facility. 2624 2.âLake Okeechobee Watershed Research and Water Quality 2625 Monitoring Program.âThe coordinating agencies shall implement a 2626 Lake Okeechobee Watershed Research and Water Quality Monitoring 2627 Program. Results from the program shall be used by the 2628 department, in cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, 2629 to make modifications to the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management 2630 Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 403.067, as appropriate. The 2631 program shall: 2632 a.âEvaluate all available existing water quality data 2633 concerning total phosphorus in the Lake Okeechobee watershed, 2634 develop a water quality baseline to represent existing 2635 conditions for total phosphorus, monitor long-term ecological 2636 changes, including water quality for total phosphorus, and 2637 measure compliance with water quality standards for total 2638 phosphorus, including any applicable total maximum daily load 2639 for the Lake Okeechobee watershed as established pursuant to s. 2640 403.067. Beginning March 1, 2020, and every 5 years thereafter, 2641 the department shall reevaluate water quality and quantity data 2642 to ensure that the appropriate projects are being designated and 2643 incorporated into the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action 2644 Plan adopted pursuant to s. 403.067. The district shall 2645 implement a total phosphorus monitoring program at appropriate 2646 structures owned or operated by the district and within the Lake 2647 Okeechobee watershed. 2648 b.âDevelop a Lake Okeechobee water quality model that 2649 reasonably represents the phosphorus dynamics of Lake Okeechobee 2650 and incorporates an uncertainty analysis associated with model 2651 predictions. 2652 c.âDetermine the relative contribution of phosphorus from 2653 all identifiable sources and all primary and secondary land 2654 uses. 2655 d.âConduct an assessment of the sources of phosphorus from 2656 the Upper Kissimmee Chain of Lakes and Lake Istokpoga and their 2657 relative contribution to the water quality of Lake Okeechobee. 2658 The results of this assessment shall be used by the coordinating 2659 agencies as part of the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action 2660 Plan adopted pursuant to s. 403.067 to develop interim measures, 2661 best management practices, or regulations, as applicable. 2662 e.âAssess current water management practices within the 2663 Lake Okeechobee watershed and develop recommendations for 2664 structural and operational improvements. Such recommendations 2665 shall balance water supply, flood control, estuarine salinity, 2666 maintenance of a healthy lake littoral zone, and water quality 2667 considerations. 2668 f.âEvaluate the feasibility of alternative nutrient 2669 reduction technologies, including sediment traps, canal and 2670 ditch maintenance, fish production or other aquaculture, 2671 bioenergy conversion processes, and algal or other biological 2672 treatment technologies and include any alternative nutrient 2673 reduction technologies determined to be feasible in the Lake 2674 Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 2675 403.067. 2676 g.âConduct an assessment of the water volumes and timing 2677 from the Lake Okeechobee watershed and their relative 2678 contribution to the water level changes in Lake Okeechobee and 2679 to the timing and volume of water delivered to the estuaries. 2680 (b)âLake Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan.âThe Lake 2681 Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 2682 403.067 shall be the watershed phosphorus control component for 2683 Lake Okeechobee. The Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action 2684 Plan shall be a multifaceted approach designed to achieve the 2685 total maximum daily load by improving the management of 2686 phosphorus sources within the Lake Okeechobee watershed through 2687 implementation of regulations and best management practices, 2688 continued development and continued implementation of improved 2689 best management practices, improvement and restoration of the 2690 hydrologic function of natural and managed systems, and use of 2691 alternative technologies for nutrient reduction. As provided in 2692 s. 403.067(7)(a)6., the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action 2693 Plan must include milestones for implementation and water 2694 quality improvement, and an associated water quality monitoring 2695 component sufficient to evaluate whether reasonable progress in 2696 pollutant load reductions is being achieved over time. An 2697 assessment of progress toward these milestones shall be 2698 conducted every 5 years and shall be provided to the Governor, 2699 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 2700 Representatives. Revisions to the plan shall be made, as 2701 appropriate, as a result of each 5-year review. Revisions to the 2702 basin management action plan shall be made by the department in 2703 cooperation with the basin stakeholders. Revisions to best 2704 management practices or other measures must follow the 2705 procedures set forth in s. 403.067(7)(c)4. Revised basin 2706 management action plans must be adopted pursuant to s. 2707 403.067(7)(a)5. The department shall develop an implementation 2708 schedule establishing 5-year, 10-year, and 15-year measurable 2709 milestones and targets to achieve the total maximum daily load 2710 no more than 20 years after adoption of the plan. The initial 2711 implementation schedule shall be used to provide guidance for 2712 planning and funding purposes and is exempt from chapter 120. 2713 Upon the first 5-year review, the implementation schedule shall 2714 be adopted as part of the plan. If achieving the total maximum 2715 daily load within 20 years is not practicable, the 2716 implementation schedule must contain an explanation of the 2717 constraints that prevent achievement of the total maximum daily 2718 load within 20 years, an estimate of the time needed to achieve 2719 the total maximum daily load, and additional 5-year measurable 2720 milestones, as necessary. The coordinating agencies shall 2721 develop an interagency agreement pursuant to ss. 373.046 and 2722 373.406(5) which is consistent with the department taking the 2723 lead on water quality protection measures through the Lake 2724 Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 2725 403.067; the district taking the lead on hydrologic improvements 2726 pursuant to paragraph (a); and the Department of Agriculture and 2727 Consumer Services taking the lead on agricultural interim 2728 measures, best management practices, and other measures adopted 2729 pursuant to s. 403.067. The interagency agreement must specify 2730 how best management practices for nonagricultural nonpoint 2731 sources are developed and how all best management practices are 2732 implemented and verified consistent with s. 403.067 and this 2733 section and must address measures to be taken by the 2734 coordinating agencies during any best management practice 2735 reevaluation performed pursuant to subparagraphs 5. and 10. The 2736 department shall use best professional judgment in making the 2737 initial determination of best management practice effectiveness. 2738 The coordinating agencies may develop an intergovernmental 2739 agreement with local governments to implement nonagricultural 2740 nonpoint source best management practices within their 2741 respective geographic boundaries. The coordinating agencies 2742 shall facilitate the application of federal programs that offer 2743 opportunities for water quality treatment, including 2744 preservation, restoration, or creation of wetlands on 2745 agricultural lands. 2746 1.âAgricultural nonpoint source best management practices, 2747 developed in accordance with s. 403.067 and designed to achieve 2748 the objectives of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed Protection 2749 Program as part of a phased approach of management strategies 2750 within the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan, shall 2751 be implemented on an expedited basis. 2752 2.âAs provided in s. 403.067, the Department of Agriculture 2753 and Consumer Services, in consultation with the department, the 2754 district, and affected parties, shall initiate rule development 2755 for interim measures, best management practices, conservation 2756 plans, nutrient management plans, or other measures necessary 2757 for Lake Okeechobee watershed total maximum daily load 2758 reduction. The rule shall include thresholds for requiring 2759 conservation and nutrient management plans and criteria for the 2760 contents of such plans. Development of agricultural nonpoint 2761 source best management practices shall initially focus on those 2762 priority basins listed in sub-subparagraph (a)1.a. The 2763 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, in consultation 2764 with the department, the district, and affected parties, shall 2765 conduct an ongoing program for improvement of existing and 2766 development of new agricultural nonpoint source interim measures 2767 and best management practices. The Department of Agriculture and 2768 Consumer Services shall adopt such practices by rule. The 2769 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall work with 2770 the University of Florida Institute of Food and Agriculture 2771 Sciences to review and, where appropriate, develop revised 2772 nutrient application rates for all agricultural soil amendments 2773 in the watershed. 2774 3.âAs provided in s. 403.067, where agricultural nonpoint 2775 source best management practices or interim measures have been 2776 adopted by rule of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 2777 Services, the owner or operator of an agricultural nonpoint 2778 source addressed by such rule shall either implement interim 2779 measures or best management practices or demonstrate compliance 2780 with state water quality standards addressed by the Lake 2781 Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 2782 403.067 by conducting monitoring prescribed by the department or 2783 the district. Owners or operators of agricultural nonpoint 2784 sources who implement interim measures or best management 2785 practices adopted by rule of the Department of Agriculture and 2786 Consumer Services shall be subject to s. 403.067. 2787 4.âThe district or department shall conduct monitoring at 2788 representative sites to verify the effectiveness of agricultural 2789 nonpoint source best management practices. 2790 5.âWhere water quality problems are detected for 2791 agricultural nonpoint sources despite the appropriate 2792 implementation of adopted best management practices, a 2793 reevaluation of the best management practices shall be conducted 2794 pursuant to s. 403.067(7)(c)4. If the reevaluation determines 2795 that the best management practices or other measures require 2796 modification, the rule shall be revised to require 2797 implementation of the modified practice within a reasonable 2798 period as specified in the rule. 2799 6.âAs provided in s. 403.067, nonagricultural nonpoint 2800 source best management practices, developed in accordance with 2801 s. 403.067 and designed to achieve the objectives of the Lake 2802 Okeechobee Watershed Protection Program as part of a phased 2803 approach of management strategies within the Lake Okeechobee 2804 Basin Management Action Plan, shall be implemented on an 2805 expedited basis. 2806 7.âThe department and the district are directed to work 2807 with the University of Florida Institute of Food and 2808 Agricultural Sciences to develop appropriate nutrient 2809 application rates for all nonagricultural soil amendments in the 2810 watershed. As provided in s. 403.067, the department, in 2811 consultation with the district and affected parties, shall 2812 develop nonagricultural nonpoint source interim measures, best 2813 management practices, or other measures necessary for Lake 2814 Okeechobee watershed total maximum daily load reduction. 2815 Development of nonagricultural nonpoint source best management 2816 practices shall initially focus on those priority basins listed 2817 in sub-subparagraph (a)1.a. The department, the district, and 2818 affected parties shall conduct an ongoing program for 2819 improvement of existing and development of new interim measures 2820 and best management practices. The department or the district 2821 shall adopt such practices by rule. 2822 8.âWhere nonagricultural nonpoint source best management 2823 practices or interim measures have been developed by the 2824 department and adopted by the district, the owner or operator of 2825 a nonagricultural nonpoint source shall implement interim 2826 measures or best management practices and be subject to s. 2827 403.067. 2828 9.âAs provided in s. 403.067, the district or the 2829 department shall conduct monitoring at representative sites to 2830 verify the effectiveness of nonagricultural nonpoint source best 2831 management practices. 2832 10.âWhere water quality problems are detected for 2833 nonagricultural nonpoint sources despite the appropriate 2834 implementation of adopted best management practices, a 2835 reevaluation of the best management practices shall be conducted 2836 pursuant to s. 403.067(7)(c)4. If the reevaluation determines 2837 that the best management practices or other measures require 2838 modification, the rule shall be revised to require 2839 implementation of the modified practice within a reasonable time 2840 period as specified in the rule. 2841 11.âSubparagraphs 2. and 7. do not preclude the department 2842 or the district from requiring compliance with water quality 2843 standards or with current best management practices requirements 2844 set forth in any applicable regulatory program authorized by law 2845 for the purpose of protecting water quality. Subparagraphs 2. 2846 and 7. are applicable only to the extent that they do not 2847 conflict with any rules adopted by the department that are 2848 necessary to maintain a federally delegated or approved program. 2849 12.âThe program of agricultural best management practices 2850 set forth in the Everglades Program of the district meets the 2851 requirements of this paragraph and s. 403.067(7) for the Lake 2852 Okeechobee watershed. An entity in compliance with the best 2853 management practices set forth in the Everglades Program of the 2854 district may elect to use that permit in lieu of the 2855 requirements of this paragraph. The provisions of subparagraph 2856 5. apply to this subparagraph. This subparagraph does not alter 2857 any requirement of s. 373.4592. 2858 13.âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, in 2859 cooperation with the department and the district, shall provide 2860 technical and financial assistance for implementation of 2861 agricultural best management practices, subject to the 2862 availability of funds. The department and district shall provide 2863 technical and financial assistance for implementation of 2864 nonagricultural nonpoint source best management practices, 2865 subject to the availability of funds. 2866 14.âProjects that reduce the phosphorus load originating 2867 from domestic wastewater systems within the Lake Okeechobee 2868 watershed shall be given funding priority in the departmentâs 2869 revolving loan program under s. 403.1835. The department shall 2870 coordinate and provide assistance to those local governments 2871 seeking financial assistance for such priority projects. 2872 15.âProjects that make use of private lands, or lands held 2873 in trust for Indian tribes, to reduce nutrient loadings or 2874 concentrations within a basin by one or more of the following 2875 methods: restoring the natural hydrology of the basin, restoring 2876 wildlife habitat or impacted wetlands, reducing peak flows after 2877 storm events, increasing aquifer recharge, or protecting range 2878 and timberland from conversion to development, are eligible for 2879 grants available under this section from the coordinating 2880 agencies. For projects of otherwise equal priority, special 2881 funding priority will be given to those projects that make best 2882 use of the methods outlined above that involve public-private 2883 partnerships or that obtain federal match money. Preference 2884 ranking above the special funding priority will be given to 2885 projects located in a rural area of opportunity designated by 2886 the Governor. Grant applications may be submitted by any person 2887 or tribal entity, and eligible projects may include, but are not 2888 limited to, the purchase of conservation and flowage easements, 2889 hydrologic restoration of wetlands, creating treatment wetlands, 2890 development of a management plan for natural resources, and 2891 financial support to implement a management plan. 2892 16.âThe department shall require all entities disposing of 2893 domestic wastewater biosolids within the Lake Okeechobee 2894 watershed and the remaining areas of Okeechobee, Glades, and 2895 Hendry Counties to develop and submit to the department an 2896 agricultural use plan that limits applications based upon 2897 phosphorus loading consistent with the Lake Okeechobee Basin 2898 Management Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 403.067. The 2899 department may not authorize the disposal of domestic wastewater 2900 biosolids within the Lake Okeechobee watershed unless the 2901 applicant can affirmatively demonstrate that the phosphorus in 2902 the biosolids will not add to phosphorus loadings in Lake 2903 Okeechobee or its tributaries. This demonstration shall be based 2904 on achieving a net balance between phosphorus imports relative 2905 to exports on the permitted application site. Exports shall 2906 include only phosphorus removed from the Lake Okeechobee 2907 watershed through products generated on the permitted 2908 application site. This prohibition does not apply to Class AA 2909 biosolids that are marketed and distributed as fertilizer 2910 products in accordance with department rule. 2911 17.âPrivate and government-owned utilities within Monroe, 2912 Miami-Dade, Broward, Palm Beach, Martin, St. Lucie, Indian 2913 River, Okeechobee, Highlands, Hendry, and Glades Counties that 2914 dispose of wastewater biosolids sludge from utility operations 2915 and septic removal by land spreading in the Lake Okeechobee 2916 watershed may use a line item on local sewer rates to cover 2917 wastewater biosolids treatment and disposal if such disposal and 2918 treatment is done by approved alternative treatment methodology 2919 at a facility located within the areas designated by the 2920 Governor as rural areas of opportunity pursuant to s. 288.0656. 2921 This additional line item is an environmental protection 2922 disposal fee above the present sewer rate and may not be 2923 considered a part of the present sewer rate to customers, 2924 notwithstanding provisions to the contrary in chapter 367. The 2925 fee shall be established by the county commission or its 2926 designated assignee in the county in which the alternative 2927 method treatment facility is located. The fee shall be 2928 calculated to be no higher than that necessary to recover the 2929 facilityâs prudent cost of providing the service. Upon request 2930 by an affected county commission, the Florida Public Service 2931 Commission will provide assistance in establishing the fee. 2932 Further, for utilities and utility authorities that use the 2933 additional line item environmental protection disposal fee, such 2934 fee may not be considered a rate increase under the rules of the 2935 Public Service Commission and shall be exempt from such rules. 2936 Utilities using this section may immediately include in their 2937 sewer invoicing the new environmental protection disposal fee. 2938 Proceeds from this environmental protection disposal fee shall 2939 be used for treatment and disposal of wastewater biosolids, 2940 including any treatment technology that helps reduce the volume 2941 of biosolids that require final disposal, but such proceeds may 2942 not be used for transportation or shipment costs for disposal or 2943 any costs relating to the land application of biosolids in the 2944 Lake Okeechobee watershed. 2945 18.âNo less frequently than once every 3 years, the Florida 2946 Public Service Commission or the county commission through the 2947 services of an independent auditor shall perform a financial 2948 audit of all facilities receiving compensation from an 2949 environmental protection disposal fee. The Florida Public 2950 Service Commission or the county commission through the services 2951 of an independent auditor shall also perform an audit of the 2952 methodology used in establishing the environmental protection 2953 disposal fee. The Florida Public Service Commission or the 2954 county commission shall, within 120 days after completion of an 2955 audit, file the audit report with the President of the Senate 2956 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives and shall 2957 provide copies to the county commissions of the counties set 2958 forth in subparagraph 17. The books and records of any 2959 facilities receiving compensation from an environmental 2960 protection disposal fee shall be open to the Florida Public 2961 Service Commission and the Auditor General for review upon 2962 request. 2963 19.âThe Department of Health shall require all entities 2964 disposing of septage within the Lake Okeechobee watershed to 2965 develop and submit to that agency an agricultural use plan that 2966 limits applications based upon phosphorus loading consistent 2967 with the Lake Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan adopted 2968 pursuant to s. 403.067. 2969 20.âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 2970 shall initiate rulemaking requiring entities within the Lake 2971 Okeechobee watershed which land-apply animal manure to develop 2972 resource management system level conservation plans, according 2973 to United States Department of Agriculture criteria, which limit 2974 such application. Such rules must include criteria and 2975 thresholds for the requirement to develop a conservation or 2976 nutrient management plan, requirements for plan approval, site 2977 inspection requirements, and recordkeeping requirements. 2978 21.âThe district shall revise chapter 40E-61, Florida 2979 Administrative Code, to be consistent with this section and s. 2980 403.067; provide for a monitoring program for nonpoint source 2981 dischargers required to monitor water quality by s. 403.067; and 2982 provide for the results of such monitoring to be reported to the 2983 coordinating agencies. 2984 (c)âLake Okeechobee Exotic Species Control Program.âThe 2985 coordinating agencies shall identify the exotic species that 2986 threaten the native flora and fauna within the Lake Okeechobee 2987 watershed and develop and implement measures to protect the 2988 native flora and fauna. 2989 (d)âLake Okeechobee Internal Phosphorus Management 2990 Program.âThe district, in cooperation with the other 2991 coordinating agencies and interested parties, shall evaluate the 2992 feasibility of Lake Okeechobee internal phosphorus load removal 2993 projects. The evaluation shall be based on technical 2994 feasibility, as well as economic considerations, and shall 2995 consider all reasonable methods of phosphorus removal. If 2996 projects are found to be feasible, the district shall 2997 immediately pursue the design, funding, and permitting for 2998 implementing such projects. 2999 (e)âLake Okeechobee Watershed Protection Program 3000 implementation.âThe coordinating agencies shall be jointly 3001 responsible for implementing the Lake Okeechobee Watershed 3002 Protection Program, consistent with the statutory authority and 3003 responsibility of each agency. Annual funding priorities shall 3004 be jointly established, and the highest priority shall be 3005 assigned to programs and projects that address sources that have 3006 the highest relative contribution to loading and the greatest 3007 potential for reductions needed to meet the total maximum daily 3008 loads. In determining funding priorities, the coordinating 3009 agencies shall also consider the need for regulatory compliance, 3010 the extent to which the program or project is ready to proceed, 3011 and the availability of federal matching funds or other nonstate 3012 funding, including public-private partnerships. Federal and 3013 other nonstate funding shall be maximized to the greatest extent 3014 practicable. 3015 (f)âPriorities and implementation schedules.âThe 3016 coordinating agencies are authorized and directed to establish 3017 priorities and implementation schedules for the achievement of 3018 total maximum daily loads, compliance with the requirements of 3019 s. 403.067, and compliance with applicable water quality 3020 standards within the waters and watersheds subject to this 3021 section. 3022 (4)âCALOOSAHATCHEE RIVER WATERSHED PROTECTION PROGRAM AND 3023 ST. LUCIE RIVER WATERSHED PROTECTION PROGRAM.âA protection 3024 program shall be developed and implemented as specified in this 3025 subsection. To protect and restore surface water resources, the 3026 program shall address the reduction of pollutant loadings, 3027 restoration of natural hydrology, and compliance with applicable 3028 state water quality standards. The program shall be achieved 3029 through a phased program of implementation. In addition, 3030 pollutant load reductions based upon adopted total maximum daily 3031 loads established in accordance with s. 403.067 shall serve as a 3032 program objective. In the development and administration of the 3033 program, the coordinating agencies shall maximize opportunities 3034 provided by federal and local government cost-sharing programs 3035 and opportunities for partnerships with the private sector and 3036 local government. The program shall include a goal for salinity 3037 envelopes and freshwater inflow targets for the estuaries based 3038 upon existing research and documentation. The goal may be 3039 revised as new information is available. This goal shall seek to 3040 reduce the frequency and duration of undesirable salinity ranges 3041 while meeting the other water-related needs of the region, 3042 including water supply and flood protection, while recognizing 3043 the extent to which water inflows are within the control and 3044 jurisdiction of the district. 3045 (a)âCaloosahatchee River Watershed Protection Plan.âThe 3046 district, in cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, 3047 Lee County, and affected counties and municipalities, shall 3048 complete a River Watershed Protection Plan in accordance with 3049 this subsection. The Caloosahatchee River Watershed Protection 3050 Plan shall identify the geographic extent of the watershed, be 3051 coordinated as needed with the plans developed pursuant to 3052 paragraph (3)(a) and paragraph (c) of this subsection, and 3053 include the Caloosahatchee River Watershed Construction Project 3054 and the Caloosahatchee River Watershed Research and Water 3055 Quality Monitoring Program. 3056 1.âCaloosahatchee River Watershed Construction Project.âTo 3057 improve the hydrology, water quality, and aquatic habitats 3058 within the watershed, the district shall, no later than January 3059 1, 2012, plan, design, and construct the initial phase of the 3060 Watershed Construction Project. In doing so, the district shall: 3061 a.âDevelop and designate the facilities to be constructed 3062 to achieve stated goals and objectives of the Caloosahatchee 3063 River Watershed Protection Plan. 3064 b.âConduct scientific studies that are necessary to support 3065 the design of the Caloosahatchee River Watershed Construction 3066 Project facilities. 3067 c.âIdentify the size and location of all such facilities. 3068 d.âProvide a construction schedule for all such facilities, 3069 including the sequencing and specific timeframe for construction 3070 of each facility. 3071 e.âProvide a schedule for the acquisition of lands or 3072 sufficient interests necessary to achieve the construction 3073 schedule. 3074 f.âProvide a schedule of costs and benefits associated with 3075 each construction project and identify funding sources. 3076 g.âTo ensure timely implementation, coordinate the design, 3077 scheduling, and sequencing of project facilities with the 3078 coordinating agencies, Lee County, other affected counties and 3079 municipalities, and other affected parties. 3080 2.âCaloosahatchee River Watershed Research and Water 3081 Quality Monitoring Program.âThe district, in cooperation with 3082 the other coordinating agencies and local governments, shall 3083 implement a Caloosahatchee River Watershed Research and Water 3084 Quality Monitoring Program that builds upon the districtâs 3085 existing research program and that is sufficient to carry out, 3086 comply with, or assess the plans, programs, and other 3087 responsibilities created by this subsection. The program shall 3088 also conduct an assessment of the water volumes and timing from 3089 Lake Okeechobee and the Caloosahatchee River watershed and their 3090 relative contributions to the timing and volume of water 3091 delivered to the estuary. 3092 (b)âCaloosahatchee River Watershed Basin Management Action 3093 Plans.âThe basin management action plans adopted pursuant to s. 3094 403.067 for the Caloosahatchee River watershed shall be the 3095 Caloosahatchee River Watershed Pollutant Control Program. The 3096 plans shall be designed to be a multifaceted approach to 3097 reducing pollutant loads by improving the management of 3098 pollutant sources within the Caloosahatchee River watershed 3099 through implementation of regulations and best management 3100 practices, development and implementation of improved best 3101 management practices, improvement and restoration of the 3102 hydrologic function of natural and managed systems, and 3103 utilization of alternative technologies for pollutant reduction, 3104 such as cost-effective biologically based, hybrid 3105 wetland/chemical and other innovative nutrient control 3106 technologies. As provided in s. 403.067(7)(a)6., the 3107 Caloosahatchee River Watershed Basin Management Action Plans 3108 must include milestones for implementation and water quality 3109 improvement, and an associated water quality monitoring 3110 component sufficient to evaluate whether reasonable progress in 3111 pollutant load reductions is being achieved over time. An 3112 assessment of progress toward these milestones shall be 3113 conducted every 5 years and shall be provided to the Governor, 3114 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 3115 Representatives. Revisions to the plans shall be made, as 3116 appropriate, as a result of each 5-year review. Revisions to the 3117 basin management action plans shall be made by the department in 3118 cooperation with the basin stakeholders. Revisions to best 3119 management practices or other measures must follow the 3120 procedures set forth in s. 403.067(7)(c)4. Revised basin 3121 management action plans must be adopted pursuant to s. 3122 403.067(7)(a)5. The department shall develop an implementation 3123 schedule establishing 5-year, 10-year, and 15-year measurable 3124 milestones and targets to achieve the total maximum daily load 3125 no more than 20 years after adoption of the plan. The initial 3126 implementation schedule shall be used to provide guidance for 3127 planning and funding purposes and is exempt from chapter 120. 3128 Upon the first 5-year review, the implementation schedule shall 3129 be adopted as part of the plans. If achieving the total maximum 3130 daily load within 20 years is not practicable, the 3131 implementation schedule must contain an explanation of the 3132 constraints that prevent achievement of the total maximum daily 3133 load within 20 years, an estimate of the time needed to achieve 3134 the total maximum daily load, and additional 5-year measurable 3135 milestones, as necessary. The coordinating agencies shall 3136 facilitate the use of federal programs that offer opportunities 3137 for water quality treatment, including preservation, 3138 restoration, or creation of wetlands on agricultural lands. 3139 1.âNonpoint source best management practices consistent 3140 with s. 403.067, designed to achieve the objectives of the 3141 Caloosahatchee River Watershed Protection Program, shall be 3142 implemented on an expedited basis. The coordinating agencies may 3143 develop an intergovernmental agreement with local governments to 3144 implement the nonagricultural, nonpoint source best management 3145 practices within their respective geographic boundaries. 3146 2.âThis subsection does not preclude the department or the 3147 district from requiring compliance with water quality standards, 3148 adopted total maximum daily loads, or current best management 3149 practices requirements set forth in any applicable regulatory 3150 program authorized by law for the purpose of protecting water 3151 quality. This subsection applies only to the extent that it does 3152 not conflict with any rules adopted by the department or 3153 district which are necessary to maintain a federally delegated 3154 or approved program. 3155 3.âProjects that make use of private lands, or lands held 3156 in trust for Indian tribes, to reduce pollutant loadings or 3157 concentrations within a basin, or that reduce the volume of 3158 harmful discharges by one or more of the following methods: 3159 restoring the natural hydrology of the basin, restoring wildlife 3160 habitat or impacted wetlands, reducing peak flows after storm 3161 events, or increasing aquifer recharge, are eligible for grants 3162 available under this section from the coordinating agencies. 3163 4.âThe Caloosahatchee River Watershed Basin Management 3164 Action Plans shall require assessment of current water 3165 management practices within the watershed and shall require 3166 development of recommendations for structural, nonstructural, 3167 and operational improvements. Such recommendations shall 3168 consider and balance water supply, flood control, estuarine 3169 salinity, aquatic habitat, and water quality considerations. 3170 5.âThe department may not authorize the disposal of 3171 domestic wastewater biosolids within the Caloosahatchee River 3172 watershed unless the applicant can affirmatively demonstrate 3173 that the nutrients in the biosolids will not add to nutrient 3174 loadings in the watershed. This demonstration shall be based on 3175 achieving a net balance between nutrient imports relative to 3176 exports on the permitted application site. Exports shall include 3177 only nutrients removed from the watershed through products 3178 generated on the permitted application site. This prohibition 3179 does not apply to Class AA biosolids that are marketed and 3180 distributed as fertilizer products in accordance with department 3181 rule. 3182 6.âThe Department of Health shall require all entities 3183 disposing of septage within the Caloosahatchee River watershed 3184 to develop and submit to that agency an agricultural use plan 3185 that limits applications based upon nutrient loading consistent 3186 with any basin management action plan adopted pursuant to s. 3187 403.067. 3188 7.âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 3189 shall require entities within the Caloosahatchee River watershed 3190 which land-apply animal manure to develop a resource management 3191 system level conservation plan, according to United States 3192 Department of Agriculture criteria, which limit such 3193 application. Such rules shall include criteria and thresholds 3194 for the requirement to develop a conservation or nutrient 3195 management plan, requirements for plan approval, site inspection 3196 requirements, and recordkeeping requirements. 3197 8.âThe district shall initiate rulemaking to provide for a 3198 monitoring program for nonpoint source dischargers required to 3199 monitor water quality pursuant to s. 403.067(7)(b)2.g. or (c)3. 3200 The results of such monitoring must be reported to the 3201 coordinating agencies. 3202 (c)âSt. Lucie River Watershed Protection Plan.âThe 3203 district, in cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, 3204 Martin County, and affected counties and municipalities shall 3205 complete a plan in accordance with this subsection. The St. 3206 Lucie River Watershed Protection Plan shall identify the 3207 geographic extent of the watershed, be coordinated as needed 3208 with the plans developed pursuant to paragraph (3)(a) and 3209 paragraph (a) of this subsection, and include the St. Lucie 3210 River Watershed Construction Project and St. Lucie River 3211 Watershed Research and Water Quality Monitoring Program. 3212 1.âSt. Lucie River Watershed Construction Project.âTo 3213 improve the hydrology, water quality, and aquatic habitats 3214 within the watershed, the district shall, no later than January 3215 1, 2012, plan, design, and construct the initial phase of the 3216 Watershed Construction Project. In doing so, the district shall: 3217 a.âDevelop and designate the facilities to be constructed 3218 to achieve stated goals and objectives of the St. Lucie River 3219 Watershed Protection Plan. 3220 b.âIdentify the size and location of all such facilities. 3221 c.âProvide a construction schedule for all such facilities, 3222 including the sequencing and specific timeframe for construction 3223 of each facility. 3224 d.âProvide a schedule for the acquisition of lands or 3225 sufficient interests necessary to achieve the construction 3226 schedule. 3227 e.âProvide a schedule of costs and benefits associated with 3228 each construction project and identify funding sources. 3229 f.âTo ensure timely implementation, coordinate the design, 3230 scheduling, and sequencing of project facilities with the 3231 coordinating agencies, Martin County, St. Lucie County, other 3232 interested parties, and other affected local governments. 3233 2.âSt. Lucie River Watershed Research and Water Quality 3234 Monitoring Program.âThe district, in cooperation with the other 3235 coordinating agencies and local governments, shall establish a 3236 St. Lucie River Watershed Research and Water Quality Monitoring 3237 Program that builds upon the districtâs existing research 3238 program and that is sufficient to carry out, comply with, or 3239 assess the plans, programs, and other responsibilities created 3240 by this subsection. The district shall also conduct an 3241 assessment of the water volumes and timing from Lake Okeechobee 3242 and the St. Lucie River watershed and their relative 3243 contributions to the timing and volume of water delivered to the 3244 estuary. 3245 (d)âSt. Lucie River Watershed Basin Management Action 3246 Plan.âThe basin management action plan for the St. Lucie River 3247 watershed adopted pursuant to s. 403.067 shall be the St. Lucie 3248 River Watershed Pollutant Control Program and shall be designed 3249 to be a multifaceted approach to reducing pollutant loads by 3250 improving the management of pollutant sources within the St. 3251 Lucie River watershed through implementation of regulations and 3252 best management practices, development and implementation of 3253 improved best management practices, improvement and restoration 3254 of the hydrologic function of natural and managed systems, and 3255 use of alternative technologies for pollutant reduction, such as 3256 cost-effective biologically based, hybrid wetland/chemical and 3257 other innovative nutrient control technologies. As provided in 3258 s. 403.067(7)(a)6., the St. Lucie River Watershed Basin 3259 Management Action Plan must include milestones for 3260 implementation and water quality improvement, and an associated 3261 water quality monitoring component sufficient to evaluate 3262 whether reasonable progress in pollutant load reductions is 3263 being achieved over time. An assessment of progress toward these 3264 milestones shall be conducted every 5 years and shall be 3265 provided to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 3266 Speaker of the House of Representatives. Revisions to the plan 3267 shall be made, as appropriate, as a result of each 5-year 3268 review. Revisions to the basin management action plan shall be 3269 made by the department in cooperation with the basin 3270 stakeholders. Revisions to best management practices or other 3271 measures must follow the procedures set forth in s. 3272 403.067(7)(c)4. Revised basin management action plans must be 3273 adopted pursuant to s. 403.067(7)(a)5. The department shall 3274 develop an implementation schedule establishing 5-year, 10-year, 3275 and 15-year measurable milestones and targets to achieve the 3276 total maximum daily load no more than 20 years after adoption of 3277 the plan. The initial implementation schedule shall be used to 3278 provide guidance for planning and funding purposes and is exempt 3279 from chapter 120. Upon the first 5-year review, the 3280 implementation schedule shall be adopted as part of the plan. If 3281 achieving the total maximum daily load within 20 years is not 3282 practicable, the implementation schedule must contain an 3283 explanation of the constraints that prevent achievement of the 3284 total maximum daily load within 20 years, an estimate of the 3285 time needed to achieve the total maximum daily load, and 3286 additional 5-year measurable milestones, as necessary. The 3287 coordinating agencies shall facilitate the use of federal 3288 programs that offer opportunities for water quality treatment, 3289 including preservation, restoration, or creation of wetlands on 3290 agricultural lands. 3291 1.âNonpoint source best management practices consistent 3292 with s. 403.067, designed to achieve the objectives of the St. 3293 Lucie River Watershed Protection Program, shall be implemented 3294 on an expedited basis. The coordinating agencies may develop an 3295 intergovernmental agreement with local governments to implement 3296 the nonagricultural nonpoint source best management practices 3297 within their respective geographic boundaries. 3298 2.âThis subsection does not preclude the department or the 3299 district from requiring compliance with water quality standards, 3300 adopted total maximum daily loads, or current best management 3301 practices requirements set forth in any applicable regulatory 3302 program authorized by law for the purpose of protecting water 3303 quality. This subsection applies only to the extent that it does 3304 not conflict with any rules adopted by the department or 3305 district which are necessary to maintain a federally delegated 3306 or approved program. 3307 3.âProjects that make use of private lands, or lands held 3308 in trust for Indian tribes, to reduce pollutant loadings or 3309 concentrations within a basin, or that reduce the volume of 3310 harmful discharges by one or more of the following methods: 3311 restoring the natural hydrology of the basin, restoring wildlife 3312 habitat or impacted wetlands, reducing peak flows after storm 3313 events, or increasing aquifer recharge, are eligible for grants 3314 available under this section from the coordinating agencies. 3315 4.âThe St. Lucie River Watershed Basin Management Action 3316 Plan shall require assessment of current water management 3317 practices within the watershed and shall require development of 3318 recommendations for structural, nonstructural, and operational 3319 improvements. Such recommendations shall consider and balance 3320 water supply, flood control, estuarine salinity, aquatic 3321 habitat, and water quality considerations. 3322 5.âThe department may not authorize the disposal of 3323 domestic wastewater biosolids within the St. Lucie River 3324 watershed unless the applicant can affirmatively demonstrate 3325 that the nutrients in the biosolids will not add to nutrient 3326 loadings in the watershed. This demonstration shall be based on 3327 achieving a net balance between nutrient imports relative to 3328 exports on the permitted application site. Exports shall include 3329 only nutrients removed from the St. Lucie River watershed 3330 through products generated on the permitted application site. 3331 This prohibition does not apply to Class AA biosolids that are 3332 marketed and distributed as fertilizer products in accordance 3333 with department rule. 3334 6.âThe Department of Health shall require all entities 3335 disposing of septage within the St. Lucie River watershed to 3336 develop and submit to that agency an agricultural use plan that 3337 limits applications based upon nutrient loading consistent with 3338 any basin management action plan adopted pursuant to s. 403.067. 3339 7.âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 3340 shall initiate rulemaking requiring entities within the St. 3341 Lucie River watershed which land-apply animal manure to develop 3342 a resource management system level conservation plan, according 3343 to United States Department of Agriculture criteria, which limit 3344 such application. Such rules shall include criteria and 3345 thresholds for the requirement to develop a conservation or 3346 nutrient management plan, requirements for plan approval, site 3347 inspection requirements, and recordkeeping requirements. 3348 8.âThe district shall initiate rulemaking to provide for a 3349 monitoring program for nonpoint source dischargers required to 3350 monitor water quality pursuant to s. 403.067(7)(b)2.g. or (c)3. 3351 The results of such monitoring must be reported to the 3352 coordinating agencies. 3353 (e)âRiver Watershed Protection Plan implementation.âThe 3354 coordinating agencies shall be jointly responsible for 3355 implementing the River Watershed Protection Plans, consistent 3356 with the statutory authority and responsibility of each agency. 3357 Annual funding priorities shall be jointly established, and the 3358 highest priority shall be assigned to programs and projects that 3359 have the greatest potential for achieving the goals and 3360 objectives of the plans. In determining funding priorities, the 3361 coordinating agencies shall also consider the need for 3362 regulatory compliance, the extent to which the program or 3363 project is ready to proceed, and the availability of federal or 3364 local government matching funds. Federal and other nonstate 3365 funding shall be maximized to the greatest extent practicable. 3366 (f)âEvaluation.âBeginning March 1, 2020, and every 5 years 3367 thereafter, concurrent with the updates of the basin management 3368 action plans adopted pursuant to s. 403.067, the department, in 3369 cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, shall conduct 3370 an evaluation of any pollutant load reduction goals, as well as 3371 any other specific objectives and goals, as stated in the River 3372 Watershed Protection Programs. The district shall identify 3373 modifications to facilities of the River Watershed Construction 3374 Projects, as appropriate, or any other elements of the River 3375 Watershed Protection Programs. The evaluation shall be included 3376 in the annual progress report submitted pursuant to this 3377 section. 3378 (g)âPriorities and implementation schedules.âThe 3379 coordinating agencies are authorized and directed to establish 3380 priorities and implementation schedules for the achievement of 3381 total maximum daily loads, the requirements of s. 403.067, and 3382 compliance with applicable water quality standards within the 3383 waters and watersheds subject to this section. 3384 (5)âADOPTION AND IMPLEMENTATION OF TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY 3385 LOADS AND DEVELOPMENT OF BASIN MANAGEMENT ACTION PLANS.âThe 3386 department is directed to expedite development and adoption of 3387 total maximum daily loads for the Caloosahatchee River and 3388 estuary. The department is further directed to propose for final 3389 agency action total maximum daily loads for nutrients in the 3390 tidal portions of the Caloosahatchee River and estuary. The 3391 department shall initiate development of basin management action 3392 plans for Lake Okeechobee, the Caloosahatchee River watershed 3393 and estuary, and the St. Lucie River watershed and estuary as 3394 provided in s. 403.067 as follows: 3395 (a)âBasin management action plans shall be developed as 3396 soon as practicable as determined necessary by the department to 3397 achieve the total maximum daily loads established for the Lake 3398 Okeechobee watershed and the estuaries. 3399 (b)âThe Phase II technical plan development pursuant to 3400 paragraph (3)(a), and the River Watershed Protection Plans 3401 developed pursuant to paragraphs (4)(a) and (c), shall provide 3402 the basis for basin management action plans developed by the 3403 department. 3404 (c)âAs determined necessary by the department to achieve 3405 the total maximum daily loads, additional or modified projects 3406 or programs that complement those in the legislatively ratified 3407 plans may be included during the development of the basin 3408 management action plan. 3409 (d)âAs provided in s. 403.067, management strategies and 3410 pollution reduction requirements set forth in a basin management 3411 action plan subject to permitting by the department under 3412 subsection (7) must be completed pursuant to the schedule set 3413 forth in the basin management action plan, as amended. The 3414 implementation schedule may extend beyond the 5-year permit 3415 term. 3416 (e)âAs provided in s. 403.067, management strategies and 3417 pollution reduction requirements set forth in a basin management 3418 action plan for a specific pollutant of concern are not subject 3419 to challenge under chapter 120 at the time they are 3420 incorporated, in an identical form, into a department or 3421 district issued permit or a permit modification issued in 3422 accordance with subsection (7). 3423 (6)âANNUAL PROGRESS REPORT.âEach March 1, the district, in 3424 cooperation with the other coordinating agencies, shall report 3425 on implementation of this section as part of the consolidated 3426 annual report required in s. 373.036(7). The annual report shall 3427 include a summary of the conditions of the hydrology, water 3428 quality, and aquatic habitat in the northern Everglades based on 3429 the results of the Research and Water Quality Monitoring 3430 Programs, the status of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed 3431 Construction Project, the status of the Caloosahatchee River 3432 Watershed Construction Project, and the status of the St. Lucie 3433 River Watershed Construction Project. In addition, the report 3434 shall contain an annual accounting of the expenditure of funds 3435 from the Save Our Everglades Trust Fund. At a minimum, the 3436 annual report shall provide detail by program and plan, 3437 including specific information concerning the amount and use of 3438 funds from federal, state, or local government sources. In 3439 detailing the use of these funds, the district shall indicate 3440 those designated to meet requirements for matching funds. The 3441 district shall prepare the report in cooperation with the other 3442 coordinating agencies and affected local governments. The 3443 department shall report on the status of the Lake Okeechobee 3444 Basin Management Action Plan, the Caloosahatchee River Watershed 3445 Basin Management Action Plan, and the St. Lucie River Watershed 3446 Basin Management Action Plan. The Department of Agriculture and 3447 Consumer Services shall report on the status of the 3448 implementation of the agricultural nonpoint source best 3449 management practices, including an implementation assurance 3450 report summarizing survey responses and response rates, site 3451 inspections, and other methods used to verify implementation of 3452 and compliance with best management practices in the Lake 3453 Okeechobee, Caloosahatchee River, and St. Lucie River 3454 watersheds. 3455 (7)âLAKE OKEECHOBEE PROTECTION PERMITS.â 3456 (a)âThe Legislature finds that the Lake Okeechobee 3457 Watershed Protection Program will benefit Lake Okeechobee and 3458 downstream receiving waters and is in the public interest. The 3459 Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project and structures 3460 discharging into or from Lake Okeechobee shall be constructed, 3461 operated, and maintained in accordance with this section. 3462 (b)âPermits obtained pursuant to this section are in lieu 3463 of all other permits under this chapter or chapter 403, except 3464 those issued under s. 403.0885, if applicable. Additional 3465 permits are not required for the Lake Okeechobee Watershed 3466 Construction Project, or structures discharging into or from 3467 Lake Okeechobee, if such project or structures are permitted 3468 under this section. Construction activities related to 3469 implementation of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed Construction 3470 Project may be initiated before final agency action, or notice 3471 of intended agency action, on any permit from the department 3472 under this section. 3473 (c)1.âOwners or operators of existing structures which 3474 discharge into or from Lake Okeechobee that were subject to 3475 Department Consent Orders 91-0694, 91-0705, 91-0706, 91-0707, 3476 and RT50-205564 and that are subject to s. 373.4592(4)(a) do not 3477 require a permit under this section and shall be governed by 3478 permits issued under ss. 373.413 and 373.416 and the Lake 3479 Okeechobee Basin Management Action Plan adopted pursuant to s. 3480 403.067. 3481 2.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, owners and operators 3482 of existing structures which are subject to s. 373.4592(4)(a) 3483 and which discharge into or from Lake Okeechobee shall be deemed 3484 in compliance with this paragraph if they are in full compliance 3485 with the conditions of permits under chapter 40E-63, Florida 3486 Administrative Code. 3487 3.âBy January 1, 2017, the district shall submit to the 3488 department a complete application for a permit modification to 3489 the Lake Okeechobee structure permits to incorporate proposed 3490 changes necessary to ensure that discharges through the 3491 structures covered by this permit are consistent with the basin 3492 management action plan adopted pursuant to s. 403.067. 3493 (d)âThe department shall require permits for district 3494 regional projects that are part of the Lake Okeechobee Watershed 3495 Construction Project. However, projects that qualify as exempt 3496 pursuant to s. 373.406 do not require permits under this 3497 section. Such permits shall be issued for a term of 5 years upon 3498 the demonstration of reasonable assurances that: 3499 1.âDistrict regional projects that are part of the Lake 3500 Okeechobee Watershed Construction Project shall achieve the 3501 design objectives for phosphorus required in subparagraph 3502 (3)(a)1.; 3503 2.âFor water quality standards other than phosphorus, the 3504 quality of water discharged from the facility is of equal or 3505 better quality than the inflows; 3506 3.âDischarges from the facility do not pose a serious 3507 danger to public health, safety, or welfare; and 3508 4.âAny impacts on wetlands or state-listed species 3509 resulting from implementation of that facility of the Lake 3510 Okeechobee Construction Project are minimized and mitigated, as 3511 appropriate. 3512 (e)âAt least 60 days before the expiration of any permit 3513 issued under this section, the permittee may apply for a renewal 3514 thereof for a period of 5 years. 3515 (f)âPermits issued under this section may include any 3516 standard conditions provided by department rule which are 3517 appropriate and consistent with this section. 3518 (g)âPermits issued under this section may be modified, as 3519 appropriate, upon review and approval by the department. 3520 (8)âRESTRICTIONS ON WATER DIVERSIONS.âThe South Florida 3521 Water Management District shall not divert waters to the St. 3522 Lucie River, the Indian River estuary, the Caloosahatchee River 3523 or its estuary, or the Everglades National Park, in such a way 3524 that the state water quality standards are violated, that the 3525 nutrients in such diverted waters adversely affect indigenous 3526 vegetation communities or wildlife, or that fresh waters 3527 diverted to the St. Lucie River or the Caloosahatchee or Indian 3528 River estuaries adversely affect the estuarine vegetation or 3529 wildlife, unless the receiving waters will biologically benefit 3530 by the diversion. However, diversion is permitted when an 3531 emergency is declared by the water management district, if the 3532 Secretary of Environmental Protection concurs. 3533 (9)âPRESERVATION OF PROVISIONS RELATING TO THE EVERGLADES. 3534 Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify any 3535 provision of s. 373.4592. 3536 (10)âRIGHTS OF SEMINOLE TRIBE OF FLORIDA.âNothing in this 3537 section is intended to diminish or alter the governmental 3538 authority and powers of the Seminole Tribe of Florida, or 3539 diminish or alter the rights of that tribe, including, but not 3540 limited to, rights under the water rights compact among the 3541 Seminole Tribe of Florida, the state, and the South Florida 3542 Water Management District as enacted by Pub. L. No. 100-228, 101 3543 Stat. 1556, and chapter 87-292, Laws of Florida, and codified in 3544 s. 285.165, and rights under any other agreement between the 3545 Seminole Tribe of Florida and the state or its agencies. No land 3546 of the Seminole Tribe of Florida shall be used for water storage 3547 or stormwater treatment without the consent of the tribe. 3548 (11)âRELATIONSHIP TO STATE WATER QUALITY STANDARDS.âNothing 3549 in this section shall be construed to modify any existing state 3550 water quality standard or to modify the provisions of s. 3551 403.067(6) and (7)(a). 3552 (12)âRULES.âThe governing board of the district is 3553 authorized to adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 3554 to implement the provisions of this section. 3555 (13)âPRESERVATION OF AUTHORITY.âNothing in this section 3556 shall be construed to restrict the authority otherwise granted 3557 to agencies pursuant to this chapter and chapter 403, and 3558 provisions of this section shall be deemed supplemental to the 3559 authority granted to agencies pursuant to this chapter and 3560 chapter 403. 3561 Section 39.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3562 made by this act to section 403.0872, Florida Statutes, in a 3563 reference thereto, section 403.0873, Florida Statutes, is 3564 reenacted to read: 3565 403.0873âFlorida Air-Operation License Fee Account.âThe 3566 âFlorida Air-Operation License Fee Accountâ is established as a 3567 nonlapsing account within the Department of Environmental 3568 Protectionâs Air Pollution Control Trust Fund. All license fees 3569 paid pursuant to s. 403.0872(11) shall be deposited in such 3570 account and must be used solely by the department and approved 3571 local programs under the advice and consent of the Legislature 3572 to pay the direct and indirect costs required to develop and 3573 administer the major stationary source air-operation permit 3574 program. Any approved local pollution control program that 3575 accepts funds from the department as reimbursement for services 3576 it performs in the implementation of the major source air 3577 operation permit program, receives delegation from the 3578 department or the United States Environmental Protection Agency 3579 for implementation of the major source air-operation permit 3580 program, or performs functions, duties, or activities 3581 substantially similar to or duplicative of the services 3582 performed by the department or the United States Environmental 3583 Protection Agency in the implementation of the major source air 3584 operation permit program is prohibited from collecting 3585 additional fees attributable to such services from any source 3586 permitted under s. 403.0872. 3587 Section 40.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 3588 made by this act to section 403.1838, Florida Statutes, in a 3589 reference thereto, paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 3590 403.1835, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3591 403.1835âWater pollution control financial assistance.â 3592 (3)âThe department may provide financial assistance through 3593 any program authorized under 33 U.S.C. s. 1383, as amended, 3594 including, but not limited to, making grants and loans, 3595 providing loan guarantees, purchasing loan insurance or other 3596 credit enhancements, and buying or refinancing local debt. This 3597 financial assistance must be administered in accordance with 3598 this section and applicable federal authorities. 3599 (d)âThe department may make grants to financially 3600 disadvantaged small communities, as defined in s. 403.1838, 3601 using funds made available from grant allocations on loans 3602 authorized under subsection (4). The grants must be administered 3603 in accordance with s. 403.1838. 3604 Section 41.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.